Day 3 of the 30 Day Song Challenge - "A Song That Makes You Happy"
Happy Tuesday everyone! :)
Fiberality Designs
The devils on my shoulder give refusal.
Nothing beats a romantic beach wedding ceremony, especially if you exchange vows just before the sunset. Isn’t that very sweet? You are exchanging vows with the person that you are going to spend your whole life with while the cool breeze of the wind softly touches your skins. This type of wedding theme also needs a specific type of wedding gowns. Perfect beach wedding gowns are made of lightweight fabric and cool enough to handle the humid air rather than a full ball gown skirt and that will be very complicated.
A couple of weeks ago, my team, Origins BJJ, hosted the De Souza brothers for a seminar. This is a mini documentary that shows what they did here and their take on other non- BJJ related things.
When we got to the hospital around 3am, we signed some paperwork, and I was admitted to the evaluation part of the maternity hospital. First thing they did was hook me up to a monitor that recorded the baby’s heart beat, and my contractions. At this point I was only beginning to feel, what I could describe as, slight menstrual cramping. Next they did a fluids test to see if I indeed did break my water. It came back positive. Thus, I was told, now it was a matter of waiting for my contractions to increase. When I get into active labor, then I would get transferred to my own room. I was told that for first time moms this can take hours.
Vice President Biden was not the only person that thought we should probably hedge our bets in going after bin Laden. In July 2008, Larry King asked Senator McCain:
When he called back 15 minutes later, I knew he was drunk. And at this point, he wasn’t even making sense. I decided to go over there to check on him at the very least. I knew some sweet surprise was pretty much toast at this point.
While, I've been a "slacker" on the blog front, I assure you, I'm not slacking around the house at all. And I have pictures to prove it! Here are some shots of just a few summer projects we've got going.
The project website — vedanta.edu.in — reads: In an honest attempt at forging a partnership for providing quality education to the largely deprived children of the rural areas, the VUP of Anil Agarwal Foundation has been supporting the children belonging to the project impacted village for admission into DAV Public School, Puri.
8oz yogurt
Alternate: Jarrod Masseud Karimi (quit before the National Poetry Slam)
I went with Pink chocolate dipped treats from cake balls to marshmellows and pretzels. Candied apples, cupcakes as well as cookie pops. There was also a Pink Popcorn on pinterest however they used pink tinted butter. I didn't want a greasy buttery treat since we would be outside and I didn't want it to get soggy so I instead made a pan popped corn, covered in a pink tinted Candy bark. That WAS DELICIOUS. Since the party it has been made a few times and will continue to be served on family movie nights, slumber parties etc. It was the same pink popcorn concept but with my own personal twist.
As you know, I love my friend Google. I’m always checking with him for my pictures for my Blog and he always delivers.
for my rusty gears.
Gogu, Jena’s telepathic enchanted frog and best friend is simply a sweetheart, both in frog-form and later when he’s transformed back into his proper shape.
* affirmative action
My main note was to always propel the film using imagery. We are really steering away from dialogue filling in the gaps, so the film is very visual and Jon has done an amazing job so far. Above my desk I had the words “The giallo Michael Mann never directed” and that is the core of our Yellow influences.
Ruvo just announced that he recruited Nobel Prize laureate Dr. Stanley Prusiner as the chairman of the center’s scientific advisory board. Ruvo says he has been able to recruit great scientists because of the allure of Nevada’s weather, cheap housing and no state income tax. Nevertheless, many of the Cleveland Clinic researchers seem to be there for short visits, preferring to call Cleveland, Ohio, home. Most of the early accolades at the center have been for its patient care, something high on Ruvo’s agenda since his depressing experience with his own father. Gazing at the Gehry-designed building, Ruvo declares, “I hope that what happens in Vegas … benefits the world. Vegas can bring attention to this disease like no one else.”
Add the eggs and flour in two halves, beating well, until the mixture is light and fluffy.
Room: 4
For my first card I paired them together and added a bunch of twine to create the giraffe's mane and tail:
Yesterday. The Whispering Petunia’s mother filed for the sole custody of our son. I’ve been advised by friends and family members to try and avoid writing about it on social media. We’ve looked into the legal implications of anything written, either on Facebook or on this blog – nothing can be used against us if we are not attacking anyone’s character, or so says the lawyers of the interwebs.
Enjoy and let us know how you feel,
So, what's your secret talent? I'm weirdly good at knowing exactly what time it is, even if I haven't looked at a clock in hours. (Whattup.) And my little brother can ride a unicycle!
and on the way back, we ended up at triple 8 with muralli and ghana. HAHAHA the pseudo alter bridge frontman and my gossip girl bitch :) i am NOT hooking you up.
Joan @ Stitching Squad
Yes, I am scared. Terrified, in fact. And worried.
reality tends to be 100% densely working
I've been growing more keenly aware of where my food comes from (and what it's actually made out of) the last couple of years. I grew up eating fast food. My parents both worked at a fast food company for 25 years. It was just... what you ate. It never occurred to me that you should eat any differently. I didn't spend much time in the produce aisle until I was 18 and interested in dropping some weight I'd put on while on the pill. Switching to fruits, vegetables, and protein meant dropping 60 lbs in about 6-8 months. It felt almost effortless.
1. It broke as I was returning home after the last performance of “The Wizard of Oz” at Billerica Memorial High School. It was at the first rehearsal of “The Wizard of Oz”, two weeks ago, that I discovered a small crack of unknown origin on the screen. As this was the first imperfection on an otherwise unblemished device, I was sorely disappointed. I spent the whole night staring at the crack, running my fingertip across it, and then the edge of my nail, to determine its depth. After much fretting and fuming I decided that maybe I could learn to live with an imperfect but still functional iPod Touch.
So yesterday I found myself right by the London Bridge with this MASSIVE War Ship sitting there in the Thames and what else could I do?
I have been drinking a fair amount during 2011. I have been fortunate to visit a few gatherings where copious amounts of small quantities of beer has been thrusted onto my eager hands.
I am so grateful for computers and being able to watch so many amazing shows via a few simple cables to hook-up the computer to the TV. Fun stuff.
Combine shrimp shells and chicken broth in a large Dutch oven; bring to a boil. Reduce heat, and simmer, uncovered, 20 minutes. Pour mixture through a wire-mesh strainer into a bowl, discarding shells. Set broth aside, and keep warm.
Red spotted fabric used as tablecloth -- Fabric.com
Weights lifted,
The problem with it in this situation is that it implies choice. The alternative to "not doing that" in the case of cancer was to roll up in a ball and wait to die. Not exactly the plan I was working from .
Themes
Remarkable Creatures:. I haven't finished this one yet, but I'm really enjoying it. It's set in the 19th century in Lyme Regis, England (another Austen tie in!) and deals with the relationship between two female fossil hunters. It's set in the first half of the 19th century so evolution hasn't been proposed yet, but these fossil hunters find fossils that don't fit animals that are alive today, so where did they come from? One becomes a very famous fossil hunter, and their friendship and work is played out against the background of 19th century opinions about women working and taking credit for discoveries like these fossils. Highly recommended! Makes me want to read more Tracy Chevalier. I enjoyed The Girl with the Pearl Earring and The Lady and the Unicorn (and seeing the tapestries at the Musee Cluny) so I'll probably add more of her books to my "to read" list.
The big omission in terms of connectivity is the absence of an HDMI or Mini HDMI port that would enable you to hook the tablet up to a monitor or HD TV and enjoy your content on a larger screen. This has become almost standard on most tablets and, while we appreciate the Acer Iconia Tab A200 is a budget option, we still would have liked to see it here.
I’ve already discussed the issue of women maintaining the private sphere here. And for some mothers (myself included) this saying makes sense. Hubby and I both work to maintain the home — but let’s face it, it’s easier for him to get to the mosque. When I couldn’t attend evening prayers at the mosque because they were held during Eryn’s bedtime, I prayed at home. Apparently I received more reward doing that, than if I had actually gone to the mosque.
Yup! One of our all-time favorite beers in the world is back, in all of it's glorious funkiness.
envelope
1 individuals--either
Normally when a blogger doesn't post for, say, a week. They have a good excuse.
using triangles.
Joint Base Lewis-McChord should be deeply investigated. I suspect it is a hub for top secret military experiments on soldiers.
I coloured a Tando bookplate in Victorian Velvet distress stain, then a couple of coats of clear Distress Stickles over this, stamped a sentiment onto paper coloured with Victorian Velvet DI, a couple of white velvet brads, and adhered to the front of the box.
If I am given a chance at this time to serve the motherland, I still be happy to fulfill this long lost dream of mine.
So we have a little gardening and a lot of cooking going on at our house. But imagine an organization that does this on a national level and reaches out to thousands of kids and their families. Alice Waters (of Chez Panisse) and her Edible Schoolyard Project are doing just that by teaching kids to garden, harvest, and cook. And for all you naysayers who believe these aren't valuable skills (I'm not naming any names), try writing a recipe and notice the direct application of science, math, and English. And, of course, there's the ultimate payoff of giving a kid the tools to feed himself and his family healthful food. And then passing it on to his kids. And so on.
Well, one of the sites I was browsing recently is My Memories.
By almost any measure, it was clear that I could not tell what was enough. I didn’t trust my own body experience to tell me what I needed, wanted, or when I was ready to stop. I overworked, over-ate, over prepared, and over-thought just about everything in my life.
of the slow autumn at my window,
It's hard to see in the pic, but there are 2 layers of the name. The lower layer is purple & the top is pink. They are just a little off set. I used my Cuttlebug w/ an embossing folder for the pink layer of the name. I also added some pink & purple rhinestones at the top & bottom for some extra sparkle & accents. All pieces & the letter is sealed with Krylon Preserve It.
Does this mean President Obama’s positions on Pedophilia have also evolved?
The most notable object we have on loan is a magnificent facsimile of a 15th-century illuminated manuscript called the Rothschild Miscellany.
5. Allow to cool, then strain the rich broth of all the “floaty bits” and discard them. You can now freeze or refrigerate the stock in meal size portions.
Gemini - Holly’s sister, Lucy, a serial man-eater finally meets her match, which puts her long-term relationship and career in jeopardy. Cheating she discovers, can have devastating consequences.
disappear
Communications in & around the mansion were now blocked by my team, and so I had to give a hand signal & verbal confirmation to end the operation to one of the members of my team who saw me in the backyard of the mansion from a window; and then communications were un-blocked, and I let headquarters know to tell all support teams to abort the operation.
Highly, highly unlikely. The show lacked a creative direction and after a promising start the ratings fell off a cliff. This show trended the wrong way, and hasn’t given much evidence that it can be consistently good enough to stabilize.
Employees may need a team leader to follow. Quality circles can be sources of information on how to do things better and more efficiently. New ideas can be discussed and presented with enthusiastic participation from the employees.
Responding to queries from CNET on Friday, Microsoft said any law must allow “us to honor the privacy and security promises we make to our customers.”
Baby, you were light in this dark world of mine.
I had my fluids, herbal tea... lots of it... all day. I slept VERY well because I couldn't stay awake if my life depended on it!! And as you will read below, I am definitely 3 for 3 today!!!
2. HOW DID YOU GUYS MEET?
Yep. Open water swimming is a whole different beast than pool swimming. And I’m considering registering myself for this event. Right now I’m just considering it – I don’t think I’ll make a decision for another month or so. Right now I have my upcoming stair climb challenge to focus on (have you donated yet? It’s goes to a great cause!), and then, after that, I have another fitness challenge already lined up at the end of May that I have yet to mention on this blog (one challenge at a time, folks!). So if I make a decision in early June, I’ll still have over two months to train and prepare.
The show was highly controversial, eventually being taken from the air after a comment about Marilyn Monroe‘s conversion to Judaism: “Now that Marilyn Monroe is kosher, Arthur Miller can eat her”. He later stated that he “hadn’t meant it that way”. Several months later, the show began to be broadcast in a slightly revised format—it was taped in order to provide a buffer for Levant’s antics. This, however, failed to prevent Levant from making comments about Mae West‘s sex life that caused the show to be canceled for good. Levant was also a frequent guest on Jack Paar‘s talk show, prompting Paar in later years to sign off by saying, “Good night, Oscar Levant, wherever you are.”On an appearance on the Tonight Show, from New York, Levant once quipped that his Jaguar ambulance was waiting outside for him.
When I was a member of the Science Fiction and Fantasy Writers, I read an article in the newsletter that caught my interest. It was an interview with Tim Powers. I read snippets to my husband asking him (like he knows), “How can he do that? How can anyone do that?” Outlines? Those are things you write after a term paper is written and only because the teacher requires it. If they had a crown for that, I’d be Queen.
Today, I'm here to tell you about the third book on the "Blog Book Tour", and an absolutely FABULOUS giveaway that I am sharing with you only because there are two to give away....so after I win one, there will still be one left for one of you!
1 T frozen OJ concentrate
You might notice the pin sticking up from the seat, looks uncomfortable don't it? Luckily, minis aren't real people and therefore don' have real feelings! The pin also proceeds out the bottom (currently into the Cork of Holding). Due to this mighty pin; the throne can accommodate either rider, or not be used at all.
Even though we didn't have a birthday party for my daughter Melodie's second birthday, I still wanted to make her a cake, to match the cookies and cupcakes that I made for her celebration at daycare. So I made a cake in the shape of Elmo's face!
2 cups cooked lima beans
Whenever I see a sign that I find appealing, I snap a shot of it. After looking at it on my machine, I either delete or tweak. If the photo makes it to the tweaking process, it may or may not make it into a post. Here are a few that I’ve deemed worthy enough for you to check out.
Was the torch battery dying? Was the light turning into a spectrum of colours? Why were the fireballs burning? Was it day or night? Was he looking at the earth or sky?
The wave of the future, perhaps?!
Abby is growing like a wee mushroom. Every day is different. Some days are challenging, others are a breeze. She’s sleeping well through the night now, and it’s a hell of a relief for us. Every day we thank our lucky stars that she sleeps for decent periods through the night. This week she is transitioning into her own room. It’s a scary thing for me! When she finally has her first night in her own room, I know that I’m going to feel a bit off-key about it. I guess any new mother would be the same – even if it is only across the hall! Last night I had a chair delivered that is now in Abby’s room so I can sit in there with her to feed and settle her when needed. It’s a relief knowing that I can stay in there when I need to. When she’s older and she has her own bed – I’ll put the chair in my library.
Now your eyes means nothing, just windows to vacant rooms
Mesa is about a 2 hour drive from Here.
Something started happening that made me realise there was a big problem with my approach. I had done everything the self motivation books said to do and that was the problem. None of them told me what do with the plan. If they did talk about it it was the small emphasis that did not go beyond mere mention that left me thinking it was more important to draw up the plan.
"Twenty years from now you will be more disappointed by the things that you didn't do than by the ones you did do. So throw off the bowlines. Sail away from the safe harbor. Catch the trade winds in your sails. Explore. Dream. Discover. " ~ Mark Twain
It's not as fun with the lights on.
they blaze into flame
The Sower of the Seeds of Dreams follows on from the events in The Moon on the Hills, and features some characters who appeared in the earlier novel. It also resolves some plot threads that were left open at the end of The Moon on the Hills, and readers who (like me) wondered what really happened to Saturninus and Pascentia will find the answers here. However, The Sower of the Seeds of Dreams can stand alone. Readers who have read The Moon on the Hills will recognise the events and people referred to, but the backstory is explained as required and it isn’t necessary to have read The Moon on the Hills first.
However, authors can do their bit by presenting positive fictional role models. How are we doing? This is where I need readers to get involved! With all the writing I’ve been doing, I’ve been slack on my reading. I try to keep abreast of the big YA releases, but inevitably fall behind. From where I’m sitting however, young LGBT characters are massively under represented. Queer and Curious characters are seemingly non-existent.
and it's only gonna get better because i am on a mission to be super happy, fun, mom right after i finish being can't-stop-grading-papers mom in about 20 minutes. because that's when my student's exams are due in my email inbox and my spring break officially begins.
And now stood there
Incandescent light falls on her wings
I look over to see my dog sitting on Keith Moons knee. John Bonham is feeding him some cheese and onion crisps. Moony is holding a glass of beer to Moonys nose -
While much of the Catholic press seems to be focussing on the scandal in Assisi, there is in Paris, France, right now, a more extraordinary event occurring. While Assisi III/IV is a vile affront to the First Commandment, it is really more "business as usual" and besides, as far as I can see, their weren't any Catholics present at the assembly ...
As some of you might remember, I’ve been suffering from weak and peeling nails for quite some months now. Normally a 3-month-course of vitamin supplement helps, but this time it didn’t work. I was on the supplement from another brand, but now I am continuing with Oenobiol. Packed with B vitamins, it should strengthen nails and hair. I have to take two a day during a meal.
He was a big kid, too old to be scared. He leaned to his beside table and grabbed his torch. The light glowed a soft orange. Great, batteries going flat.
See/Okay/Oh/Don't know/I can't/Got it/Here
Second, an update to a piece of software called iTunes U lets teachers plan their curriculum and communicate with their students over the iPad.
But with its talents defecting, its old territories separating and becoming independent, Russia has lost its place as the top powerhouse in winter Olympics. The great athletes and coaches who once epitomized Russian strength and power have all left or moved on to represent their own independent countries. It would seem that Russia's strength has faded. But in a way, Russia's strength lives on. It continues in ice dance; not just in the bronze win, but in the gold and silver as well. It is after all, Russian coaches, who defected from Russia, who taught these two winning teams all the secrets of Russian ice dancing. Still, it's an amazing win for Canada!
-- The Dutch ‘spider-in-the-web doctrine’, seeking cross-border injunctions in the Dutch courts, may be alive and well as a strategy;
This last week's travels took us through towns and villages, along bumpy backroads and under chimney-scraping bridges and back again and we met some lovely folk along the way.
melted butter. Grill kebabs until well cooked, turning frequently, and applying butter in between. Cook until you see brown spots here and there. It will take about 20 minutes. Keep checking for doneness in between, as overcooking them can make them dry and ruin the taste. Squeeze lemon juice once they are done, if required. You can also sprinkle little garam masala to boost up the spice
Do you have smoke detectors? Fire extinguishers? Carbon-monoxide detectors?
Because there are small signs he is getting better, because he is actually working with his counselors, because he does sometimes try the skills they are teaching him-- everyone says there is nothing else to do but what we are already doing.
PAPER:Cottonball White, Kiwi Delight (Clear Dollar Stamps)
I am helping out and hosting on the SCS boards
The Winner of the All That Glitters Challenge is...
Finding a name that you can both agree on is harder than you’d think. You finally think you’ve found ‘the one’ and covered every eventuality of school yard name calling and variations of the name…you know kids can be cruel ‘mat the prat’, ‘Harry bamp’ …and so on. You sit down with your partner with a big smile to announce your new suggestion and it’s dismissed in the flutter of an eyelash because they used to know this woman who’s daughter’s best friend’s hamster was called that….and they didn’t like her, great!
Have you been looking for the perfect fabric to make those accent pillows for your couch or bed, but are tired of the stuff you find in regular fabric shops? Looking for the sweet pattern that will make your next fashion project truly you? Welcome to the relief that is a fabric oasis.
Said KT executive Kim Hyo-sil: “Internet-enabled TVs increase network traffic by up to 15 times compared to conventional IPTVs. At the current growth rate and user increase, the network won’t be able to accommodate traffic requirements and consequently it could slow down overall Internet speed. TV manufacturers are free-riding on our network, while our capacity to invest and upgrade it is shrinking due to worsening profitability. We need a better business model.
Is goat cheese an acquired taste? I will admit that as I try more goat cheeses they are starting to grow on me. Don’t get excited … I’m not sending the cows home just yet.
Top management couldn't come up with answers when committee members questioned them about what happened to officials who lost their weapons.
The place where you live — Macmillan Dictionary Online
Speaker: Yarr.
Or, maybe she wasn't on the streets for long. My other guess is she saw the Animal Control van coming, she was very excited to meet the people, and even more excited to ride in a car, regardless of where it was going.
Idling at a red-light, suffocating in the glare of a gas station, I thought of the people who lived in that house on the ridgeline, how they owned every twilight in the western sky, every secret of the sunrise, yet the report was silent, the experience unshared. In a sea of a million hungry faces, beauty shone on theirs alone. I strained under the weight of my envy, trying to push it off, resigned impatiently to a dirty smudge on my steering wheel.
What Is More Appropriate For Your Clients?
Decade Infernus (Rare Promo - Black Lotus Records 2004)
You would be very wrong there. I don't like Hawaii. I've been about 10 times and I have no desire to go again. I'd be more interested in a trip to Fresno, California, or Racine, Wisconsin. Hawaii is too hot for me. There is no good food in Hawaii. I avoid the sun. I don't like Hawaiian music. Hawaii bores me.
The consistency is THICK to say the least! It is slightly more maleable than good ol’ vaseline (petroleum jelly), yet significantly less oily. See for yourself..
Here’s an Ohmage taken from my new book Little Black Book Volume 2 that is coming out real real REAL REALLLLLL soon…
This source provides background on bipolar disorder as well as various treatments, such as medicinal, home, and alternative remedies. The Mayo Clinic also discusses how one can best prepare for a doctor’s visit if one has recently been diagnosed or suspects he/she may be suffering from the disorder.
And wear safety goggles! Yikes!
so blissfully unaware,
Petitioners questioned whether the NRC could ignore radioactive emissions from waste already present at the site in determining whether public radiation doses from new mining would exceed health and safety standards.
We started dating the summer after he graduated from high school. He was two years ahead of me, and my first real boyfriend. It sucked that he decided to traipse off to Michigan State for an education. I thought he was doing ok as a gas station attendant with a part time job during high school. But, alas, away he went. So, he was way over there, and I was down here.
4) Those that are open minded and are constantly analyzing their technique and application. (These individuals are not afraid to step outside the box, unfortunately there are not too many out there).
Attempts to show our breeding. Fooled you
It's always amazing to me the friends I've made here!!
Any questions?? Easy enough, right?! Contact us today to begin creating your custom cake!!
whatever passes along the paths of the seas.
1 large cucumber
Ben says that the hops “do more of the talking” in the tap version than they do in the bottle so I’ll just have to get out to The Local Taphouse, Mrs Parma’s in the city or The Cherry Tree in Richmond to find out just how much the hops say! If it’s what I think they’ll say I’m in for a long session.
...like a tightrope walk between this transcendently beautiful and cerebral thing that gave you all kinds of opportunities to improve yourself — through study and self-­discipline, making your mind stronger like a muscle — and at the same time it was pure self-destruction. There’s no word for that in English, for a thing that does both of those at the same time. But it’s wonderful.
It has been a full four months since then and not only have I surivived but I have thrived.
Flour a work surface and tip the dough onto it. Using your hands, shape the dough into a rough square, then bring each of the corners to the center. Turn the dough over and tuck the ends in so the dough is circular. Cover loosely with plastic wrap and leave it on the counter to relax, about half an hour.
In 1994, there were more than 85,000 privately-owned, food-producing farms in South Africa, which employed more than 1,6-million workers, who lived on the farms with their families. These farms produced excess-food on less than FIVE PERCENT of the entire surface of the country.
I think it's pretty.
Redon never placed limits on the interpretation or meaning of the symbols he employed but rather believed that a subject should never restrict one's freedom of expression or interpretation.
Legally I’m allowed to be an out gay primary school teacher. Obviously students don’t need to know too much about their teacher’s personal life, but no one would ever frown on a student asking the teacher whether he or she is married. When the student asks a LGBTQ teacher that same question it starts becoming all about sex and not love. It becomes dangerous territory.
Recept: That would be 'Who', Sir.
TURN THE PAGE
The known universe
I don’t think I can keep up with all the new social music and discovery apps that are out there. Spotify and Pandora are definitely the elder statesmen in this market and they are doing fantastic work. New comers include the very responsive AudioVroom and the massively innovative Earbits.
There are currently three gay marriage private member's bills before Federal Parliament, aimed at changing the legal definition of marriage as a union between a man and a woman.
2-10 Fish
Because he isn't.
In agreement: The View host Sherri Shepherd also did her best to repress her feelings towards the singer
These canny shopkeepers have a point. Dried figs may look as though they once hung from miniature billy goats, but their interior is a delight. Lots of seeds are surrounded by an amazing, sweet-and-sour flesh. Removing the moisture from the fruit only concentrates the flavours and sugars. We all should want, as the Christmas carol reminds us, some figgy pudding.
I've been a little preoccupied with things of late. Work, running GURPS and embarrassingly Fallout 3 Game of the Year edition have kept me away from the blog.
This is exactly what happened last fall. I was reading a marvelous book, Cutting for Stone, whose story took place in Ethiopia. I felt transported to a beautiful harsh world full of contrasts. I was reading in my Living Room, and started to look closely at an antique Ethiopian Tombom I had acquired years ago, and for the first time noticed all the intricacies in its rough carvings. That was it... my next collection would be inspired by this one artifact.
After Pip hopped down, both the clerk and I looked anxiously over at Polly as she sat quietly in the seat of the shopping cart. She perked up some as I unbuckled her, pulled her out, and dropped her down on to her feet. Before I even tried to explain to her what to do, she walked over, climbed up on the milk crate and looked straight at the clerk. She didn’t move. She didn’t flinch. She stood there serenely, two small orange hair clips holding the wayward strands of her bangs away from her face. The clerk leaned over to get a level shot. She stared calmly at him as he took a first, then a second, and then a third picture. Then, she promptly stepped down from the milk crate and stuck out her arms for me to pick her up. I hauled her in, gave her a hug and kiss, and slipped her back into the seat of the shopping cart. My worries had been unfounded. Polly had obviously watched what Pip and I did so when her turn came, she knew exactly what to do.
Those social networks have been killing a number of educational careers lately, so applying for that NEXT teachers-aide position, with the above video as a character reference, perhaps Kaylee should look forward to more time on-the-streets with her #OWS chums, not so sure her future is in education.
The Hip-Hop rumor mill has been stirring lately and amongst things we're hearing about MC Hammer allegedly going at Jiggaman and tons of other stuff that really isn't pertinent, we're beginning to also hear some sorted things about Nate Dogg's health...apparently things ain't all good...
It is also evident that I very seldom buy any new clothes, either!
“What is the fucking point,” said Arty. “Why don’t we just let the people run the country in the way they want, down down down until it’s all over. They only want to be helped in the ways they want. They’re like kids, stupid fucking kids.”
Last Updated: 12/29/2010
Up is the only way to go.
In the same way as the man’s face is covered in this picture, I think it symbolizes powerfully how so many of the victims of this riot are faceless to America; yet, there is no doubt that this man is truly one of us–flesh, blood and bone.
This next house, also in the Fabulous Forties, is a story of two buildings that joined together to become one.......a small home was joined to an adjacent building which was previously was a metal foundry dating back to 1915. The marriage has made for a home that is now over 3000 square feet and full of character. The current owners are avid Francophiles and music lovers, and the Holiday decor by Beyond the Garden Gate reflects those passions.......
I was taking things easy Tuesday. It's my chemo pill day so I stuck close to the condo and didn't play golf with my brother-in-law Jean-Marc and his friend Christiane. It gave me time to read up a little on Manuel Noriega. You know, the former military governor of Panama who was trained by and worked for the CIA, ran drugs, killed people and now wastes away in jail after finally being extradited to his homeland after trials and jail terms in both the United States and France? Yeah, that's him.
Scoop 6 globs of dough onto a baking sheet. Bake 12-14 minutes.
The hot water has been dripping continually through the spout for I don’t know how long. Months ago, I told my husband that it leaked and he said that we would have to go into the wall to fix it. (That, of course, would be too much work and, therefore, out of the question.) This afternoon, I completely took apart the hot water faucet and took it all to Lowe’s. I asked the guy in the plumbing department for help and he found for me what I needed: a new washer. The one in the faucet was about two-thirds worn away! He said he would go ahead and put it in for me, but when he tried to unscrew the screw on the washer, the screw broke. So he found a package with a screw in it and replaced it for me. I came home and put the faucet back together. And the spout doesn’t drip any more. Yipee!
“Who’s there?” my father says.
All he could offer was a three hectare plot of unregistered land for them to build a church....if they would see to the registration process, he would give them the land and help them with all the information he could to assist in the registration.
I decided to go without my iPod this morning and just enjoy the peace and quiet of a nice sunny morning, no traffic, no noises, just peaceful. I let my mind wander to what the rest of the day was going to bring. I baked a dessert last night to take to my dad's house for dinner with the family, I was going to come home to a nice breakfast my dear hubs cooked for me, and hopefully the kiddos would behave themselves some what today!
Asked if a vest or a sticker on the uniform would help, Fernandez said it would not.
But right now I'm going out to look for some Bordeaux!
Central to the resdesign of the World Trade Center site for its redevelopment is reinsertion of streets into the grid. I pointed out in Two and Fro? how this was in recognition that the original superblocking of the site was undesirable. I also lauded the design of Battery Park City as an urban design event that occurred between the original and new World Trade Center site designs. Battery Parch City vividly models the preferability of Jane Jacobs’ prescription for short blocks and frequent streets; conversely, the undesirability of superblocks.
You’ll have some fun now
A 30 day supply of Prevagen is $59.95 from their website. They do offer different packages at different costs as well as a preferred customer plan.
I wish I had thought of it. And Facebook, and the home personal computer and well, a million other things, too. Alas, I did not.
2. Because I have the right to worship as I choose, I have the responsibility to honor the right of others to worship as they see fit.
New York Times columnist Charles Blow who accused Oliver of “playing people like they’re stupid,” and Washington Post columnist Jonathan Capehart also joined in, leaving the former news anchor reeling.
The result was like a savory rice pudding and it was definitely just as comforting. It makes for an excellent side dish, though if you wanted to add some bacon, pinto beans or chorizo, it could work as a main dish, too.
Brouwerij St. Bernardus NV St. Bernardus Abt 12
How's he gonna fit THAT into his checked luggage, let alone through customs?
5-6 pm Figure out how to download Kindle app to hand-me-down iPhone (it works!)
Last week I was out on business travel to Long Island (where my employer is HQ'd). I was scheduled to get home Wednesday evening, but before I could do that, US Airways decided to demonstrate in no uncertain terms why I should never fly with them again. (I would normally elaborate more on each point to convey the true nature of the situation, but I have decided to keep this fairly brief. Don't want you nodding off in the middle, dear readers.)
RGB’s award-winning transcoder and packager are deployed with video service providers worldwide, delivering solutions for traditional and OTT video delivery and monetization.
1) Syncretistic deities, religions, or religious phenomena are not “impure” or “debased”! Scholars often say this about various religious phenomena, particularly syncretism (and the later in antiquity a source or piece of evidence concerned is, the “worse” it is in their eyes), but this is not at all the case in most circumstances. We should always be willing to give the benefit of the doubt that an altar inscription, a poem or hymn, a temple, or a statue or depiction of a deity from the ancient world springs from genuine devotion and connection to a deity. Indeed, this assumption underlies almost all reliance of modern people on premodern sources of any sort at all, and generally, it is not that problematic to assume that there is a base of pure devotion at the root of most religious expressions. Looking at religious matters in this phenomenological fashion, as the discipline of religious studies is supposed to do, is a good practice to adopt when studying anything from the polytheistic premodern periods.
Carrer Muralla 10
Amy Stein: Your show VANITY + CONSOLATION, that opened at Kris Graves Projects and runs through December 19th, is an examination women and girls in intimate domestic spaces in the small blue color town of Alton, Ill. Can you tell us more about this series?
One the hallmarks of a solid blog, vs a shitty one is the consistency of the blogging. This unfortunate blogger has been traveling and dropped the blogging baton. Humble apologies. Was temped to blog from the beach at Bellaire but…nah. The big rush is yet to come in any case. Nearly every band we care about is due to release a new album in the coming months and all will ramp up among the best perveyors of electronic music. Meantime we’ve banked a few reviews, a couple of artists we’ve been digging and a bands we missed piece that will get stuck on here sooner than later.
Chief executive Ben Baldanza earlier shrugged off calls for a $197 refund to the former Marine because of a strict no-refund policy after he purchased his ticket but was then told by his doctor he was too ill to fly.
Carlos Cortes, 57, New York, N.Y.
"I'm going to awaken racial memory," he replied. "After all, our so-called instincts are nothing more than inherited race memory, as any psychologist will tell you. If those dormant memories can be aroused, brought up from the unconscious into the conscious mind and --"
Johnny Loves Me...Shelley Fabares
Supplies: stamps - Stamping Bella Pia Puddingtop & Holiday Wishes; c/s - unknown c/s & pp; AMuse black dye ink pad; Copic markers & Spcia pens; Spellbinders regular & scalloped ovals; Martha Stewart red craft seam binding; white gel pen; pop dots; glue dots.
Through the blinding rays of hypocrisy
There is a small grocery shop not far from the S-bahn stop I usually take for university. So naturally, because of its convenience, I sometimes stop by. It’s one of those slightly shabby places selling fruit, veggies, and some mediterranean products.
This Burns My Heart is a beautiful story of love and transformation with a heroine who grabs your heart. Through the eyes and emotions of the main characters you will understand Korea intrinsically. Prepare to be drawn into this heart wrenching love story, bound by tradition and duty, as the characters journey through life and deny themselves passion. This Burns My Heart is a story that each of us can understand and relate to as it confronts so many of life's emotional dramas.
I have sanity.
Thanks so much for reading!
It's definitely a happy Monday for me! Wow, I just found out that I made it through the second round of the Spellbinders Design Team Contest! You can read all about it here on their blog, if you would like!
A: We don’t know. We forgot the calculator at home.
The largest streamer is said to be the father, the progressively smaller streamers, the male siblings of a family from oldest to youngest (represented by the smallest koi). If you see them hanging from a balcony or in front of a house, it means that family has boys.
REP. RON PAUL, R-TEXAS, PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATEA: I’m Ron Paul. I’m a congressman from Texas, 12 terms.
of The Soft Machine. I first heard it , age 16 and it changed
Spence Campbell (REP) 1.46% 37
The story of Eric is an amazing one of a young man trying to make his own medical decisions but in a system that doesn’t respect him.
SHEAN: Oh, that’s nothing, Mr. Gallagher!
OK...because I have a little guy ready to start "Dinky Day"...
He added that the centre's presiding officer was "quick to act".
“She’s one tenth your size.” Isaac snorts with a devilish grin.
“You found something?” Jacobs tired voice rose an octane.
Self-Rising Flour (1 cup) - 1 cup all-purpose flour + 1 tsp baking powder + 1/2 tsp salt + 1/4 tsp baking soda
The greeting is safmat done with a freebie,Stampin Up paper and card stock.MS border punch.The button is die cut with added twine.I did the stitching with gel pen.
Preheat the oven to 350 degrees F. In a large bowl, combine the flour, sugar, baking powder, baking soda and salt. Add buttermilk, butter and vanilla. Beat with an electric mixer on low speed for 30 seconds, scraping the bowl as needed. Increase the speed to medium and beat for 2 minutes. Add the egg whites and beat for 2 minutes more, scraping down the sides of the bowl as needed.
Well, it’s Friday and it’s good it’s Friday, but it’s also an extremely busy Friday for me. I got up this morning and went into the shower and got ready for my day. I was extremely tired, so Heather promise to put a Mountain Dew in my lunch for today. I don’t do that often, but I do it when I am dragging in the morning. I then got out of the shower as Heather headed off to work. I ate some breakfast that Heather made of fried eggs and watched “The Early Show” on CBS. I found it extremely funny that people are surprised that the oil slick from the busted oil rig may actually make it on shore. Why are they surprised? Doesn’t all water eventually lead to land? Oi, some people expect the impossible! I got some more things finished quick and before I knew it, it was time for me to be off to work while the kids were off to school.
Children love dramatization. If you are careful with time, costumes can add so much fun to singing time. You have to keep the costumes really simple and easy to put on and off. Otherwise, it takes too much time to dress and undress. This month I’m using simple costumes to dramatize people in the scriptures who followed God’s plan. I’ve written a “Who Am I?” riddle on eight cards and selected a review song that we’ll sing after guessing who the person is. I’ll put the costume and the riddle card into a small paper sack and choose children, to portray the scripture person. I’ll ask another adult to take the children out of the room to dress, then bring them back in, altogether, to sit on a row of chairs. While the children are dressing, we’ll review the song “I Will Follow God’s Plan.” One at a time, I’ll invite the children forward with their riddle. After their identity is guessed, the child can help me lead the song, in costume. ;o) Here are more pics from my costume box, along with the riddles I’m using:
But in case you are still searching for the perfect sweet potato casserole recipe, I've got one for you. If you're looking for a healthy version, you can skip this post and head over to Cassie's blog where she has a tasty, good-for-you sweet potato recipe. I got this recipe from my grandma, who cooks the absolute best southern food ever (I'm talking gumbo, chicken and dumplings, and banana pudding), so her sweet potato casserole isn't light on the butter (or sugar).
Widespread celebration of hair, wherever it grows.
once we left NZ, we cried a lot for saying good bye to frieds~~
Yes, I AM impressed with myself.
First, Kain makes no reference to just how Carter "deregulated the beer industry." No bill number, no details of the changes made, or anything.
VIDEO CORRECTION: THERE IS NO FOOTBALL MEETING TODAY!
In the Atlantic Yards chronology, the meaning of one action by the Empire State Development Corporation (ESDC) is a key to whether tax-exempt bonds for the project would be grandfathered in under new Internal Revenue Service (IRS) rules.
Jason: 3.66
“OK. Has she been here before?”
Since getting the new vehicle right after Christmas, Steve told me I had to choose:
There was another revealing feature of this period in our progress - perhaps not unrelated. The victory at Millwall in September 1993 might have been expected to usher in a time when morale and a spirit of optimism and togetherness in our party reached their highest peak. This result vindicated the policy of contesting elections and affirmed that the party leadership and the political strategies it had adopted had been proven right. Yet strangely the occasion gave rise to a most unwelcome outbreak of grumbling - and nowhere more so than East London, where the triumph had occurred. For a time this baffled us.
Whether you consider yourself and extrovert, introvert or “ambivert,” I hope you’ll take the time to listen and glean what wisdom you can from Susan Cain. Skills can be learned and improved upon. Learning to see the world through the eyes of someone different from you is a skill and Susan helps us with this by giving us a glimpse into the world of the introvert.
In 2009, Taser first implied that its products may be linked to cardiac arrest when the company asked officers to refrain from aiming the weapon at a suspect’s chest.
Which means many lovely things. It means I get to curl up in a warm sweater as I write this post from my front stoop overlooking cobbled stones. It means lovely jaunts with blessed coworkers and actually enjoying the breeze. It means acroyoga without getting over heated and the reminder of leaves changing color and newly sharpened pencils and the back to school giddiness in the stomach even if you're finally an "adult" who no longer has "summer break" and thus no longer can relish in the mystery/terror of beginnings of class sections, new teachers, cute boys, notebooks that have yet to be written in, subjects that have yet to be learned. The leaves will soon begin to fall.
Audition. It was a while ago, but I remember being in the room with McG, the casting folks, a reader and a few other people. We did the pages as written and then McG got me to do a number of takes where things just got more and more ludicrous! He was prompting to me to give him the most off-the-wall responses to a couple of scenarios from the script and I went off!!! It was fun for me, especially when I saw the faces of the casting agents who had seen me before, but NEVER doing anything like that – loud, broad comedy with a thick Black American accent. I’m from Bermuda, so I’m always putting on some accent or other, but doing that stuff in that room…I had a blast!
Here's one that's very pretty, but you need to put the mouseover on it. I got it from the comments of the blog post I'm going to list in a minute.
It's also a necessary thing as you usually only have about ten minutes per model at each sitting before they're off and out on to the stage. It's exhausting but so much fun and a real buzz.
There is also the introduction of text messaging and cell phones as hindrances to human relationships. Mattie and Josh’s relationship has been “reduced to text messaging” while one of the group texts Mattie from two feet away asking her to dance, to which she replies in person “I’m right here”
It seems that most of my inspiration got zapped the second December 26th rolled into my life, for it was on that day that I saw the very first Weight Watchers commercial in over two and a half months of television ads devoting themselves to spreading holiday joy straight to my thighs...as if fast-food commercials weren't bad enough.
Unlike many films with undercover characters, neither DiCaprio or Damon are shown debating the morality of their positions. At no point does DiCaprio struggle with the morality of adopting a criminal guise, even when he finds himself both witness to and participant in violence and murder. True, he occasionally grimaces at the sight of his criminal cohorts bashing the brains out of someone with a lead pipe. But he is quick to shoot off kneecaps when interrogating. In his conflict with the officers that manage his operation, never does he accuse them of having made him a monster. His greatest point of contention with his operators concerns his own safety in the field, especially after the revelation that the Special Investigations Unit contains a Costello informant.
You are loved unconditionally. No matter what.
It happens again and again, and I’m powerless to stop it. I’m an observer, with no power over his destiny and no exit out of this. I’m locked-in, forever watching myself make the same mistakes I would never, ever make without ever seeing the end. It isn’t fair. I want to stop. I want this nightmare gone. I want a permanent game over.
Little Cayman Island also has the Lakeside Estate located adjacent to the Sandy Point Lake near the southeastern beaches of the island.
Little did the man know he was meeting
Head over to the Glorious Treats Blog to find three variations to this base recipe which includes a Chocolate Cream Cheese Frosting and a Strawberry / Blackberry Frosting too.
We forget that we live in the safest possible neighborhood on the planet, that we moved in to for the very purpose of giving children freedom and safety to play on their own. Absurd.
I’m not looking! Honest I am not looking for heart stones.
6. melissa
It figures... I'm totally inspired and I have so much work to do that I likely won't be able to scrap until we are off to our vacation. We leave in roughly 36 hours. Yipes! And I haven't packed a thing. At least I've made lists though. We definitley don't want to forget anything - especially any of the medical stuff we have to take from now on. I'm hoping the letters from the doctors saying that my son must have access to lots of fluids and takes a medicine that must be dissolved in 8 ounces of fluid (we put it in a Pediasure) will make getting through security with more than the 3.4 ounces of liquid just a bit easier. I hope.
The 2012 Sorghum General Session will begin at 9:30am, Thursday, March 1 in the Opryland Resort and Convention Center’s Tennessee Ballroom C. Prior to the event, there will be a Sorghum Meet and Greet in Tennessee Lobby A from 8:00am to 9:30am. All Classic attendees and media are invited to attend.
1. Preheat the oven to 400 degrees.
I laughed , I cried and even giggled at some.
tall and proper in his
True worship demands our entire being: Heart, mind, body. It means our flesh. Worship is complete surrender, utter devotion, absolute, unconditional relinquishing of our autonomy.
The conference, “Off the Grid: Power, Water, and Shelter,” will be held from 8:30 am to 3:30 pm at NYIT de Seversky Mansion. The keynote speaker is Richard Rotanz, executive director of the Applied Science Center of Innovation and Excellence in Homeland Security.
When he asked about why so much food was being ordered, the government source told him essentially that “you know what is coming”. When pushed further, the government official did not elaborate.
Whiff of Joy- Snowflake Trio
Everyone has experienced it. You sit down to watch a film adaptation of a favourite book (or play or, heck, boardgame), full of trepidation but willing to forgive certain sins visited upon the original. Sometimes the results are suprisingly pleasant, others leave you a seething wreck, half angry at the filmmakers and half at yourself for even thinking that anyone could ever make a decent fist of adapting that sublime book/play/boardgame/cereal packet/powerpoint presentation/etc.
In other news, I have been making aprons for our Mother's day luncheon. Another lady in our church and I are making these. Aprons to give to all the girls age 10 and under. I have 10 made and another 13 or so cut out to put together.
But Mr. Bernanke is not alone. Do you think that the Federal Reserve has a plan or follows some kind of vision?
For now I'll share this recipe with you, luckily there was a photo of it on my hard drive.
Jess had a dream, too. She dreamed of Keith smoking in an establishment where smoking was prohibited. Jess had Keith removed from the premises and in her dream, Keith was less than happy with her. Ha-ha!
Although the internet does enable user-produced content, giving many people a new voice and platform to reach out to masses of others, this is not accessible to all people in our world. Even though access to new technologies of communication is spreading to most the most remote areas of the world, all participants are not able to be equal producers in the conversations. In particular the production and disposal of our new technologies remains mostly unaddressed, leaving very marginalized groups out of the conversation completely. As various groups successfully organize thanks to these new platforms; those mining the conducting minerals needed for them to function (often by force), are forgotten. As social movements fight for justice, human rights, and freedom through social media; the voices of those whose communities are poisoned and polluted by our e-Waste don’t get a say in the conversation. These are important aspects of technology to remember when discussing the global impacts of our new medias and communications.
It would have been so much more dramatic if he uttered those famous words which he first voiced when he announced his candidacy…”AW, Shucky Ducky!” In any event, the “Cain Train” (as he refererd to his campaign) is now nothing more than a train wreck. Good riddance, Herman. Don’t let the Koch Brothers kick you in the rear as you exit the public stage.
In a few days time it will be my One Year Blogaversary. I have some super blog candy to give away to celebrate!!! Details tomorrow.
There were a couple of reasons that were thrown around on why not to pick Peyton Manning: he couldn’t beat Florida, couldn’t win the big game, he was surrounded by great players that masked his flaws. All of these had some substance, but I think the real reason why people didn’t like Manning is that inherited wealth has a stigma in America today. Since Archie Manning was a longtime NFL quarterback, and Peyton grew up around NFL stadiums, he was looked at as football’s equivalent to having a silver spoon in his mouth. Americans will rally around the self-made man any day, but we tend resent it when those at the top were born with certain advantages.
I've still got several projects to complete before I can call the room finished...painting the walls and shelves to name a few, but I'll be sure to keep posting progress pics for those of you who care. I've also got several other projects in the pipeline that I'd like to get to before next Christmas, so check back soon.
But you probably figured that out.
Over two boxes I am only missing 18 cards from the base set with 77 doubles. I really like this set, scans don't do the cards justice.
All this, in turn, comes back to us in ways we could never expect or predict. Giving creates a network of trust, goodwill, and good energy at work that can pay off many times over in the future.
What I didn’t realize at the time was how much I would miss Julie, how much I would come to appreciate the beautiful friend she was. I had taken it for granted that Julie would be here, that I would see her again, that I would get a chance to say goodbye, that she would have many months. Instead, my first thought when friends recently suggested I start an online newspaper, was, “I wish I could talk to Julie.”
The story must ratchet up: “What is essential to a good plot? It must get worst.”
I think at one point they said I could push, but I couldn’t figure it out. I gave some half hearted attempts, but I just couldn’t find my groove. But the darn nurse kept poking me. Like, where the babies head was. And it was driving me nuts! I kept asking her to stop, but she didn’t. At one point she started just as a
Either way, this is why that online public school is crap. Social skills are important. Kids need to learn to make friends.
power working in you to produce the changes you desire.
Like so many of the people I have met in the antique business, she is just the nicest person and a delight to visit with.
The Book Goes Easy On the Subjects
Rating: 8/10 – this seems a little high, 7 or 7.5/10 might be more accurate given the film’s weaknesses. And yet: I sway towards a higher rating, because Ggotseom moves me (I’ll confess: I cried at the end).
Harvey Prince: Jodi F
Anyways, as I was standing there waiting in line (it had been like 12 minutes by then) I caught sight of this loooong worm feeling it's way through the forest of grass and mud.
Even if I don't make any money, the chairs will have served their purpose by making me realise that there's no earthly reason why I have to stick to books. I can sell anything I like, as long as I make a profit.
“Oh, no!”
I’ll send them postcards next week, once I’ve put the house up for sale. They all know I’m a sucker for the Algarve in the winter – and I’ve got just enough time to get a flight before it’s no longer an option. I don’t think any of them will be surprised that I’ve given up on soulless England and taken my bones somewhere warm. They’ll forget me over time – they’ll have to. They know what I am, but they
:: drawn birds and flowers...
(A dying scream on the evening air)
My friends and family have started to drift away
I think for a lot of us,
And God was pleased.
3/4 teaspoon herbs de provence
No, our malaise is caused by something very different. Unlike our predecessors inGen X, and especially in the Baby Boomer generation, we're learning from the mistakes of our parents and grandparents, and it's causing some major unrest. We're not uncomfortable with the idea of a career, but we're uncomfortable with working the same mundane job that we don't necessarily like for the rest of our lives just to support ourselves and a family, and in hopes that one day we can retire and enjoy the fruits our long and unfulfilling labor. We're not uncomfortable with the idea of marriage, but we don't want to jump into anything that isn't going to make us happy in the long run just to live a "normal" life and make our parents and grandparents happy; especially since we've seen divorce rates skyrocket in the last 40 years, and the misery that we as a generation have sustained as children of these divorces. We're not uncomfortable with the idea of having children, but we've learned that children will completely change your life; most likely in a good way, but it will be completely changed nonetheless. Maybe it's selfishness that causes us to have children later, or maybe we want to focus on our careers (or finding one, because as I stated before we're having trouble figuring out what we want to do with our lives), but either way, we're finding that children are a better option once we're "ready" (whatever that means).
15. Diabolik Capture-Conference (dialogue) (00:33)
...a hanging planter for some pretty spring flowers. I made the basket using some chicken wire and
To me, it sounds like the opening lines of a phone sex conversation. But let’s face it, for many of us Jews, the stomach is our sensual organ of choice. And for those of us of Eastern European extraction, the Ashkenazim, the deli is the cultural center of our sensual universe, much like the synagogue or the temple is our soul.
And it’s functional. The best part about reusing goods to decorate your home is that there is no end to how you can use those objects. The books and magazines tucked under palate sofa are just one example, but adding matching drawers could help you organize your child’s toys or give you storage space for your wine.
Answer: On April 30, 1803 the US completed the Louisiana Purchase. Effectively, 1/4 of the current United States was purchased from France for $15 million. According to Wikipedia that $15MM inflation adjusted in today’s dollars is $233MM or 42 cents per acre.
* Being soaked and staying through the football game.
The second ticket is for practicing their instrument.
heating clicks on
Wet n Wild Kabuki $1.99
"Mam, we had an incident today that we need to discuss with you. James told me that he had a crush on his friend Kelly, and asked how he should handle it. I told him to treat her like a gentleman, show respect and honor. He ran outside and jumped on top of her knocking her down."
I live on a street that seems to me a southern version of San Franscisco, with its tight row houses and steep, sloping sidewalks. Addison loves to sit on her scooter and fly down the hill in front of our house because it feels dangerous and because I have repeatedly told her not to.
Single family rentals are $3 trillion business today and growing as investors turn to real estate and opt to rent out the bargains they buy until prices improve. Today the single family rental market accounts for 21 million rental units or 52 percent of the entire residential rental market, according to a new study by CoreLogic economist Sam Khater.
"Make it fast," she said, through gritted teeth.
I could have said that she’d be welcome to join my harem, but I sensed this wouldn’t quite capture the spirit of the moment. A dose of the old Butch Cassidy charm was clearly in order.
“Giraffe, please.” It wasn’t any louder, but he reaches into his apron pocket.
first, i got to go see my friend tully run in a track meet monday night. he did great. he IS great.
Last Saturday I went with two other seniors to the Powell Gardens. It is 915 acres of gardens, some still undeveloped, but we spent nearly 5 hours there just wandering. This is the hot house where this orange tree is growing. There were banana trees, lime tree, tangerine tree,
KID: (Falling to pieces, bawling like his puppy just got murdered in front of him) "B-uh-uh-uht I waaaaant Funkytown!! Loud Funkytown!! I don't LIKE quiet Funkytown!!"
Schizoid Pils Recipe
Nattygeeks, if you can relate to this at all, regardless of what you believe, change yourself. The person you are and what you are capable of doing is directly related to how/what you think about yourself. Start small…take that small doubt, the “maybe I can’t” and turn it into “maybe I can”. Transform your thinking. (Rom. 12:2) I hope this blesses you, nattygeeks. I hope it inspires you. At the very least, I hope it helps you understand a little about me. Be blessed and continue on in your God-given destiny.
that I am smothered
I think that’s called a bait and switch.
explaining - with
See also separate post on Holton’s criticism of Wolfe on a related matter.
Best Title Sequence: Winner – LSTV (One Week Titles)/ Highly Commended – LSUTV (Poker Championship Titles)
1/2 C. crisp rice cereal
Absolutely! The biggest influences in how we choose to live in our adult homes are the houses we grew up in and where we’ve lived and visited after that. It’s unequivocally either love or hate: either you have such fond memories of your childhood home that you want to recreate it, or it was a stylistic and/or emotional nightmare, and you want to go 180° in the opposite direction.
MUA Blusher in Shade 5 & MUA Nail Varnish Shade 2 .The website makes this blush look like a deep red it is actually a pinky coral with a slight golden shimmer. Perfect. The black nail varnish is a perfect one coater for £1. Actually can't ask for more. Except maybe for MUA to give there amazing products names?
For various reasons, his words have been widely ignored.
My current play is dream-like, so I’d love someone to read it in the way they dream…but there isn’t a fixed sense of time or place…in my dreams the sense of time and place is displaced, unfixed and strange…I’m also unconvinced by the idea that the reader can change the structure of a novel by reading a chapter twice.
Number 3 – Annie Leibovitz
Nevertheless, afterwards, a chain of Shia-Sunni clashes started between Iraqi Shias and Sunnis, targeting each other’s mosques through bomb blasts, suicide attacks, and killings of their religious leaders. The general masses of both the sects, which could not grasp the reality, began to blame each other’s group for the subversive activities.
Think about it. Polish up. Figure out what you’re worth. Market yourself not in a spirit of fear (of losing your job), but with the confident knowledge of how much you’re worth. Find an employer who will recognise your value and reward it, monetarily or otherwise – it may take time, but it will be worth it in the long run. Stay shiny. Work hard to improve yourself, and this includes giving your utmost best in your job – because you are always working for yourself before you work for any employer. Never, ever undervalue yourself.
In the summer they stood
At the board table last Wednesday, the board was assured by staff that the HDSB was committed to driving the overall cost of online payments down, and would ensure that families had two equal choices: to pay online or to pay cash. And so, the implementation and improvement of an online payment system for HDSB parents continues.
Saltbushes are extremely tolerant of salt content in the ground: their name derives from the fact that they retain salt in their leaves, which makes them of great use in areas affected by soil salination.
Imagine a miniature language of only eight words, represented by the letters a through g. For the sake of this example, I will assign to each “word” an arbitrary “definition” that is made up out some of the other seven “words.”
Cass
Any and all fermented dish can be included under this. It can baked dishes with yeast / Idlis/ dhoklas/ Dosas). Anything that is fermented. Again you got to be doing a variety and not just idlis for 7 days or bread for 7 days.
The first item I will share with you is the Zebra Pink Hamper which is priced at $37.99. I have to say that I would love to have this hamper for myself. For one, my daughter now picks up her own clothes, I give the hamper credit for this. The stand of the hamper is made of natural wood and is very sturdy. It is also able to fold for easy storage and moving. The outside lining is a zebra print and the lid is a fabric liner that just drapes over the top. Super easy to open and close for a kid. On the inside there is a movable mesh liner which makes washing a breeze. You can simply take the liner out and move it to the laundry room. All of the fabric is able to be washed, so if the time comes that it looks dirty or gets smelly you can wash it with ease. I am really impressed with the quality of the hamper as a whole and how well it looks in the new room.
Police spokesperson Captain John Maluleke said no one had been arrested yet and police were still searching for suspects.
Tina Rath – The Fetch
Here's how the conversation normally goes:
There’s a moment near the very end of Frost/Nixon that sums up most of my problems with the film (and to spoil you – Nixon was totally guilty!). Just after the interviews have been taped and aired, one of the characters, in an interview segment filmed as if Frost/Nixon were a documentary, describes in detail how the medium of television is able to show Nixon’s guilt in a way that his recorded words alone could not.
1. Rinse the beans and barley and in a large pot, soak the beans and barley overnight in water (make sure you have at least 3 times the amount of water than the beans and barley. Remove any beans that have floated to the top.).
7. In the Alfred Hitchcock classic The Birds, Tippi Hedren was actually cut in the face by a bird during the shooting of one sequence.
Hopefully it will be here tomorrow, but it's not going on the website until it's actually here - you can imagine what just one damaged box can do !!
Got through Monday. Remained un-Evil.
I added a beautiful bail to the back using professional jeweller's glue and it was done! The text worked perfectly and the skull looks super creepy. Awesome! Totally one of my favs now! More and more I am allowing myself to experiment and just see what happens. So much fun!
Sure enough, a week after telling him I didn't want to do this anymore, I wanted to change my mind. By this time, he was telling me that we should try to be friends. He wasn't interested in reconnecting or reconciliation. I took this as a sign- perhaps he isn't taking me back because we aren't supposed to be.
I read this 700 pager in a week at age 13, a week that is largely a fog because I was so completely absorbed in Gedge's gripping tale of early Britain's invasion by Imperial Rome. Celtic leader Caradoc who united the tribes of Wales only to face defeat and be marched to Rome in chains, and red-haired Boudicca who continued his fight – they were far more real than algebra homework and pimply classmates. I yearned to pick up a spear and march on Rome.
I store all of my buttons, beads, charms, eyelets, brads, etc in the little containers from the fishing department that have small compartments in them. I can stack them all easily on a shelf in one of my cabinets. I keep them seperated...one for buttons, one for charms, etc. I can then pull out all of my buttons at one time to choose what I want to use and then easily put it back when I am done.
In high school, I could eat ANYTHING that I wanted (and I did) and not gain weight. I weighed 125 pounds and have been 5’9″ since at least 9th grade. (It might have been 8th) Pants would not fit me, because those that were long enough, I could almost fit a second person in with me. So I was thin.
"Grass!"
The research was supported by grants from the National Institutes of Health and National Science Foundation.
There’s an old saying that it’s always darkest before the dawn. And coming after a horrid week and a half for progressives and liberals, along comes Pimp Daddy James O’Keefe and friends.
We had a visit from a friendly solar salesperson yesterday. It was a big day for us, as we had avoided taking steps towards investigating solar for so long. I had read many websites and the official Consumer Guide to Solar PV from the Clean Energy Council (CEC) but a lot of the information felt like gobbledygook until we spoke to a real person face to face.
Since the grande opening of our new Swoozie’s store in Denver last month, we have been busy digging into the local culture and meeting all kinds of fabulous new friends along the way. One of the best things about Denver is their laid-back lifestyle and casual hospitality, much like what we’re accustomed to in the South.
Be sure your sins will find you out.
the occupation of Allenby Square and the German Colony by the Jews, the
The new Schumann porcelain factory began manufacturing its own porcelain blanks. In 1932, Christoph's son, Carl, took over the running of the porcelain factory. At a later date, of which no record seems to exists, the Carl Schumann porcelain factory was transferred into a limited company. The Carl Schumann porcelain factory acquired the Porcelain Factory Colditz, located in Colditz, Germany. It ceased to do business as a porcelain factory in 1996.
Poor thing cocks her head and runs to a door as if she's gonna come running through it!
Starting with Windows Server 2008 and Windows Vista with Service Pack 1 (SP1), Windows Error Reporting (WER) can be configured so that full user-mode dumps are collected and stored locally after a user-mode application crashes. Applications that do their own custom crash reporting, including .NET applications, are not supported by this feature.
When the children are not around me the days seem to go by so slow.
Amanpour: good point
peaked to your will.
I’ve drawn the line. This is as bad as I’m going to allow my health to get. No more excuses. We’ve pinpointed the problems, now it’s time to work towards correcting those problems. I’m so ready for this.
- The placement of STATE OF HAWAII is farther from the left margin than is DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH to the right margin.
While we have no hoops and sticks, our threesome have become quite adept at making paper airplanes. Our backyard has also seen its fair share of a game involving a flying disc and brooms, but I don’t ask too many questions (sometimes the less a parent knows the better). There have also been a fair number of highly competitive rounds of “Who Can Do the Better Cartwheel?”
Jake England's first name is listed in jail records as Jacob.
a flea-infested, good natured dog.
What more needs to be said?
with this recipe
Tamarind extract – 1 tablespoon or adjusted to taste
Me: I guess maybe you should be in charge of folding your own shirts from now on.
Suma’s ordeal began after her mother’s death when she was sent to her aunt’s place in Maadigara bedi in Kollegal by her father, Dasaiah. But her aunt, on learning of Suma’s pregnancy, sent her away.
I hear one of these calling my name!
¹The definition of a craft brewer as stated by the Brewers Association: An American craft brewer is small, independent, and traditional. Small: Annual production of beer less than 6 million barrels. Beer production is attributed to a brewer according to the rules of alternating proprietorships. Flavored malt beverages are not considered beer for purposes of this definition. Independent: Less than 25% of the craft brewery is owned or controlled (or equivalent economic interest) by an alcoholic beverage industry member who is not themselves a craft brewer. Traditional: A brewer who has either an all malt flagship (the beer which represents the greatest volume among that brewer’s brands) or has at least 50% of its volume in either all malt beers or in beers which use adjuncts to enhance rather than lighten flavor.
I debated for a long time about whether to get a GPS watch. On one hand, I liked running without a lot of stuff. On the other hand, I knew that GPS watches can be very useful training devices. When I was training for the 2012 Oakland Half Marathon, I initially used the RunKeeper app on my iPhone, which I found to be pretty handy especially as my runs got longer. One downside, though, was that it meant carrying my iPhone on every run that I wanted to track. Oh, and another was that I couldn’t take a quick peek at the data without stopping, getting my phone out of my Spibelt, and unlocking it. So, after a little bit of internal debate, I decided to take the plunge and get a GPS watch.
* simmer everything in a saucepan until sugars are dissolved, transferred to a jar or bowl.
I wanted to concentrate on all the good things I have in my life - the wonderful friends and family, the great places I have been and also the simple pleasures of my life. And I couldn't go past mentioning my beautiful husband Kevin. Most of you probably know that Kev and I met after he responded to an ad I placed in the Connections section of the local Sunday paper. That was 17 years ago this April. He was one of over 200 respondents and he was my 17th date (I am nothing if not persistent!). I first met him when he came to my place for a coffee - not the wisest thing to do, but my brother Adam was lurking in the background. He knocked on the door and Adam welcomed him and handed him a beer. Kev said later that he was desperately hoping he was at the right house (grin). We chatted for a few hours and I headed off to a nursing night shift. After that it was just one of those things. We kept ringing each other and catching up and six months later we were living together. He was nothing like the man I imagine I would spend my life with, but at the same time he was everything I needed. He was (and is) calm, kind and genuine. There is no pretence. He says what he means and doesn't tend to sugarcoat things. Most of all he loved me for all my faults and foibles - he never (and has never) asked me to change and he wanted the same things from life that I did (and still does).
But I loved it. Adored it. Fiercely.
I woke and chid my honest fingers,— 5
5. fishing
Two easy recipes have made my list of repeats. Both of them I found on Pinterest (surprise, surprise).
A large hand-painted acrylic on paper artwork. This symbolic painting features the strong image of a human biting into the sun, the source of all life on earth. Using purple, the colour of power and rugged, man-made shapes to symbolise mankind, against the colours or red and green representing the earth, life and all the things we need to survive.
What will spring bring? It has been 6 1/2 months since I last kissed my husband. How can that be? How can the seasons move forward when time has stood still?
All we ask is 3 hours help a day on our land and with wood collection. You must be able to drive and love dogs!
Nah, Gruen took him, for Bob could hear the grass grow when it came to new music.
Oh dear, I resisted a very long time (about another 14 years), well, until I 'had' to agree that digital was 'as' good?
I ripped the edges of a piece of brown cardstock and inked the edges with a brown dye pad. I also ripped the photo and another piece of inked cardstock and layered them onto my 8" x 8" patterned page to form the background.
chapped hands in a visor over my eyes
03 Man - You're In For It
If what we are looking at is a representation of a more primitive way of life, it is no wonder than World of Warcraft is so successful. Even the interface looks ancient: for reading, it is often scrolls and parchment. Even the professions, such as fishing, cooking, and herb gathering, are a nostalgia for an earlier time.
AND NO-ONE DID, shock horror
Touch. The softest flesh
After one more meal we headed to the airport. Security was pretty standard, nothing I hadn't expected. I'd now gone through two sets of airport security with knitting needles and no questions. For the curious, I was flying with KnitPicks Wooden 4" Double-Pointed Needles, or as I prefer to call them, oversized painted toothpicks. I cast on a project immediately after getting through security in La Crosse and through 4 airports no one even asked what I was making. I did, of course, have extras in my checked luggage.
Woodworth says his private motion is part of an effort to look at the question of how we decide what a human being is. He believes life begins at conception, and M-312 appears to be a jab at the malleable definition of life. Opposition members believe that by allowing Woodworth to bring this private members bill forward, he is opening the back door to pro-life supporters to voice their arguments. They fear the “abortion debate” will be re-opened.
"I'll kick your ass if you're making this shit up," she's serious. She's in no mood to be fucked with. This whole scenario is ridiculous. Who does he think she is. She's been in this game for years not like some of the bum-fluffed embryo's that keep her company at night. She knows her shit and dead people do not rise. Well, not until now.
the bill and the vicious hatred it spews against immigrants. Passage
3. What do you want reader’s to take away from reading Gastien’s story?
Even as Commerce Minister Anand Sharma asked Islamabad to expedite the process of granting the Most-Favoured Nation (MFN) status to India, the Pakistan Cabinet today postponed a decision on preparing a negative list of items for trade with India.
“Ha ha ha”
That was Mr. Bush's statement, now here is mine:
(Note: I want to issue two corrections on my initial article. "We don't mess with those Outcast guys." is the exact police quotation as related to me by Boyd; the one I used yesterday was, apparently, a grapevine-altered version. Second, I was mistaken in my first piece in reporting that Boyd had heard the police utter the comment as well; he tells me that only Stokes did.)
I made several schoolgirl errors when I made this.
And me… my heart continues to break for HSSH… and see how God keeps bringing up Psalms 37 like I said yesterday? Sunday in church we sang a hymn. I could not sing a word of it… the tears were too heavy on my heart…
or force another–
This is called crafting by the seat of your pants. Last week Lu's school had a visit from some live turkeys. When she got home she wanted to make a turkey. Since we had made several Model Magic turkeys already...I came up with this (slightly wonky looking) turkey idea.
Here's the right side of the cubes... this side is a little more jumbled. The bags on the 2nd shelf there? Yeah, that's all paper and supplies I've purchased recently and haven't put it into a proper place yet. You can see other bags sticking out from on top of the paper cubes as well. I have a bad habit of doing that.
I really enjoyed the style of this story, which is very reminiscent of S. Morganstern without the pomposity, however the plot eventually devolves into an itinerary -- she goes here to get that, and then there to get this, but than she loses that and has to backtrack.
"Second chance?"
In addition, have plenty of good still mineral water (like Evian) and enjoy as many cups of herbal tea as you fancy. Best are peppermint, rosehip and camomile tea.
Oh is there, she said. Something o’ that, I said. 150
Big love,
I added: ‘Are you suggesting we have only one choice: to clap prettily as you collect untold millions every year, or watch you take the bank somewhere else in a huff?’
‘This technique could enable them to overcome these problems and make the islands self-sufficient in a way that doesn’t harm the environment.’
I can say I don't believe in gravity all I want, but that's not going to help if I try to walk off a cliff. Like gravity, grammar exists, whether you believe in it or not. And also like gravity, if you try to ignore it, people will think you're an idiot.
the clear sheeting is taped down so it doesn't move around:
There is movement towards bringing local foods into schools, but there is much room for growth. The National Farm to School Network currently lists Marlinton Elementary School, located in Pocahontas County, as the only existing Farm 2 School program in the state.
And so my dolling-up wasn't for nothing we took a few photos, of course, lol.
red summer jewels
Sometimes this is a bad thing. Sometimes I’m affected by various things that cause me anxiety and I find the easiest way to feel relief from it is to avoid whatever is making me anxious. This includes some social interaction. So, from avoiding social interaction, I should be void of anxiety. But then I feel anxious about not interacting socially. That’s what I’m expected to do as a human being, after all. If I’m not doing something on a Saturday night, if I’m not going to a party, there must be something wrong with me. More anxiety. I go to a party where everyone is drunk, so I get drunk. I get too drunk, I have to write a paper for tomorrow. I have a bad time at the party, because I’d rather be by myself or with one other person… but that would mean I’m wasting my youth. I’m going to be old someday. Oh my god.
Raider currently has an A rating with the Better Business Bureau--which says more about the BBB's lack of usefulness for assessing publishers than it does about Raider's reputation. The BBB gives an A rating by default and doesn't change it as long as a company is willing to respond to complaints. The BBB does show six closed complaints for Raider--and it's interesting to note that they show the same sudden complaint surge that I'm seeing. Five of the six were closed in the past 12 months.
There is something logic-defying about putting rubber into a hot oven and probably the reason most of us are skeptable about buying silicone bakeware. “Won’t it melt/burn/give off toxic fumes??”
I often talk about in my blog that I am a music teacher and play guitar and sing. I’m not sure if I’ve mentioned what an amazing musician my husband is. Not only does he play guitar better than me, but it’s not even his first instrument. My husband is a pianist, and what’s incredible about him is his ability to play by ear. I have always been so impressed with this skill, because it is one that I lack completely.
Don’t forget everyone- you can see “To the Arctic” at Fernbank now! You can also buy Florian’s book “To the Arctic”! We have it and it is full of even more amazing pictures and stories. If you like the “Welcome to the Arctic” Facebook page, you can get a discount on the book!
Those keen writers among you may well subscribe to or buy the magazine Writers' Forum . Well, in the May edition, which is out now at W H Smiths, there is a two page spread on how to break into educational writing. I am happy to say I'm one of four writers who features here, having been interviewed about my educational writing. I'm really happy with how the article has turned out. Although my blog isn't listed, my linkedin presence is which will point people towards here.
Dickinson
“Again?” someone said.
Hello, I read your blog (Jessica's) about getting a job in publishing. I want so badly to work with new authors everyday, to be involved in the process of publishing and be with great works from the beginning.
But the flip side of the praise was also universal “She seemed so full of her triumphant beauty, she was so preoccupied by it that after a few moments… she began to get on your nerves. Not a movement, not a gesture was unstudied.”
Shellie Rushing Tomlinson, known as the Belle of All Things Southern is a radio host, columnist, author, speaker and founder of the All Things Southern online community, www.allthingssouthern.com. She loves meeting, greeting, laughing and learning with the whole wide world or as many who wander her way. Shellie once dreamed of writing great important things that changed the world, only once she started writing the world grinned and christened her a humorist. Shellie saw this as a problem at first, until she discovered that the laughter softens hearts, builds relationships, and invites her into people’s hurting hearts where she can share her own, which is exactly where she wanted to be all along. Look for Shellie’s latest book, Sue Ellen’s Girl Ain’t Fat, She Just Weighs Heavy wherever fine books are sold.
The Vlog brothers have helped develop several online memes such as Nerdfighteria and the term DFTBA which is an encouraging catchphrase that they have printed on t-shirts and other merchandise. The Vlog Brothers recently increased their online presence even more by setting up a forum joking called 'Your Pants'. This has lead to much humour in their videos as they will often say things such as "More can be found in a thread in Your Pants" or "Look out for each other in Your Pants". The website was recently hacked so whilst repairs were being made to the website showed the error message "Oops Your Pants is down!"
and flashed my headlights to remind him he
I remember sitting at the supper table eating kraut one cold, winter's night, when daddy got a big piece of cabbage in his mouth when he took a bite.
I cooked dinner two nights in a row! So I've now made dinner um... 3 out of the 9 nights that I've been home since the little guy was born. 1/3rd. Not bad. Not quite back to normal, but we're working on it.
Sutton's white whiskey, however, it not the first approved by the federal government. Just last Fall, Whiskey Advocate magazine ran Lew Bryson's reviews of more than a dozen unaged or minimally aged white whiskeys. There are plenty of such spirits out there and plenty more on the way.
But that's ok! I will judge the photos tonight and have the winners all ready to roll tomorrow! (I will be judging this time around since I of course waited to late to ask any one. Plus I picked the theme, so I'm psyched to pour over all of your interpretations for it! :D)
A lot of men will seek out transsexuals for dating and love because they feel that transsexuals are actually more feminine than genetic women. Yes, that is right….MORE feminine! Additionally, men find that genetic women have a lot of hangups in the bedroom department that they feel transsexuals do not have. While that may be true to some extent, it’s not a hard and fast rule to live by. Transsexuals who were born in a male body, but have female brain chemistry and are truly women stuck in a man’s body until they begin transitioning into a female outer appearance. However, it must be known that nobody should be judged solely on their outward appearance as their are many complicated circumstances that hinder the transitioning process, most of which come from society and financial barriers.
Does it follow a contemporary trend in cover art (headless kids; legless feet; the use of stock photographs rather than original art)?
Grand Opening will be Friday, October 20th and will feature Robert Horvath.
In other news, yesterday was a self-proclaimed rest day due to my limbs still smarting from my kettlebells & 8k combo.
But what the residents got instead was The Spinners Arms, a small, modern pub on the edge of the shopping precinct and right next to St Matthew’s church.
III. Training
Harsh but fair.
I grew up in well-established suburb of Melbourne, so it was a novelty to have horses over the back fence. They roamed around in a thin expanse of undeveloped land that spanned an entire block lengthways and sometimes Dad would lift me up so I could feed them grass and pat their noses. (To this day, I like horses for the fact that they prefer the grass out of a person’s hand to the grass coming out of the ground. They are humouring us like a kind uncle humours a dim-witted child, and I appreciate it, despite the fact that once you know what they’re doing you can’t help but feel it’s a tiny bit condescending.)
of his eye,
* Library story time
Near 11, a man comes into the ER saying there's someone outside who may not be breathing. The nurses hustle outside with Security and they bring in the patient on a gurney. Wow, excitement!
Apart from the ghostly testimony, there was plenty of circumstantial evidence to convict the murderers. Clerk’s wife had been seen wearing Davies’ ring; after the murder Clerk had become suddenly rich. And a number of the Camerons later claimed to have witnessed the murder itself, at sunset, from a hollow on top of the hill: they never volunteered an explanation of what they themselves had been doing up there – doubtless engaged in the illicit business of smuggling gold from Cluny to the Prince.
SO two weeks ago they flew me to DC to do training for my new job with the Art Institutes!
The next few precious moments
must acknowledge that there is more grace
white butter cream frosting (recipe follows)
The plan was to order Tot a queen size comforter and leave the room pretty much intact, minus the cedar chest and adding a dresser.
An unfulfilled promise of flight that was not to be
So, back to the crib thing. What to do, bed, crib tent…..advice?
Served with Black Gold 2009 Bourbon Aged Imperial Stout
I have two more cards to share with you that I made over the holiday break. This first card started as a friendship card, but once I added the diecut heart, I realized that once again, I had another possible Valentine's Day card. I'm not totally sure where I got the "HAPPY" chipboard piece - it was in a baggie in a larger box of miscellaneous chipboard embellishments among my stash. It might be K&Co (?)...but it started the whole design of the card, so it's an important little unknown piece!
Detective Jack Sheridan walked his six foot two frame into the offices of Cressman/Krate, the advertising agency where Dean worked. Or at least had until this morning.
Heat oven to 350F. Grease and flour two 9" inch found baking pans or a 9x13 cake pan.
show at our high school of mostly cover songs, and we liked playing
Steven Howard Berger, 45, Manalapan, N.J.
Mistakes can be fixed by dipping the paintbrush in water (pure water) and dabbing at the area. You can paint over it again with the green if you wish. I used a picture as a reference, but, again, you don't have to. If you are doing a different picture or just playing around, that's great!
I really enjoy the interactions with Vin and Elend. Even though the nobleman is a spoiled brat I think he has some type of depth. How could I not love a character who does his research while at a ball? The balls that Vin attends are quite revealing. They show that Kelsier is mostly right, many of the nobles don’t give a dang about the skaa. Some of the actions and comments are quite callous. However, Sanderson is starting to let us in a little and is showing us that not all of them are hopeless…or so it seems. I’m becoming like Vin and not trusting of Sanderson’s motives at all. I feel he has a big surprise in store for us. The anticipation is killing me.
So with out further ado, here's todays stationery:
1 c. pecans, chopped
Nothing is what it seems.
Really making things stressful and hard to complete what used to take me no time at all.
We have always had the most magical experiences at Disneyland. On this day, we snuck into the restaurant for Captain Mickey's lunch (no longer exists) not too long before they were going to close. After a relaxing lunch, we noticed that we were the only family left out on the patio. Before we knew it, our children were playing hide and seek with Mickey and his friends. Who gets to do that? hee hee
attacking the United States
so that you may be mature
You have helped me merge the love of Jesus with my crafting, I study and then I craft based on it, how wonderful is that! I'm also trying to stick to my journaling, a little harder but doable with your help, Thanks.
A Constant Struggle the debut album from US rock band S.I.Q., is one of the most intriguing releases to appear in recent months. It is a stirring and thoroughly enjoyable release which ignites the senses and emotions whilst provoking thoughts and questions. If you are looking for a release to bring you striking rock sounds, adventurous invention, and satisfying slices of metal as well as leaving you with food for thought than A Constant Struggle is the release that you should check out.
Welcome to AT&T.
I'll show you some pics of my recent activities...
I really love the cast in the urban fantasy series I’m developing now, probably because they share a lot of the things I love about where and how I grew up. They all have magical qualities that are combined with mundane lifestyles but they all try very hard to do their best and figure out the world around them. And I won’t lie – a few of them definitely are outlets for my sense of humor so it’s hilarious to write them.
The fossil ant in 25-million-year-old amber shows that these insects have been remained the same for millions of years, in other words, they did not undergo evolution.
OBSTACLES: No really big stars here to power the movie at the box office, but then again the first Alien didn’t have any either.
Donruss managed to snap a great shot of Rusty Staub choking up on the bat for his '84 issue, something you just don't see a lot of in the game anymore.
Reining in contacts from university, friends of friends, artists she had worked with at Jaguar Shoes and artists she had never met but “brazenly approached in the hope that they would get involved,” Alvarado compiled a list of 24 artists.
Masons built moving walls inside.
I used some eating apples that we were given by my friend Elizabeth when we were last in France. She gave us loads and we brought a lot of them home with us. They’re absolutely delicious and I think possibly cox’s orange pippins.
In addition,
Superintendent, United States Military Academy (‘96-‘01)
That's not to say we never get an extra shot of testosterone in the Tardis – the dappy, lovesick Rory and the uber-dashing Captain Jack spring to mind. But these men have never been companions in their own right; they only appear alongside female companions. Even in the original Doctor Who series, where there were more companions in the mix, it was rare to find the Doctor with only male company. more
We had a good day of catches. I got all the ones after waking (though sometimes he went a little as he woke up but we finished in the right place on cue), and we got a few at random times. He’s getting better at holding and stopping for a short time when he sees that I’m trying to get him over the potty bowl. The ones I missed completely were the pees he did the tines I put him down on the floor when he was content to flail his limbs and watch his sister. I caught the poop today though! He’s getting plenty of fat by the looks of it. Oh, I also got peed on once. I swear he had just had a HUGE wee on cue and put him on my lap on a wee pad bare bum and 15 minutes later his pee shooter goes off with a small pee and he gets my pants! Remember, its okay though — he’d already puked on my pants so its not like they weren’t going to be washed anyway!
I love Indian food, and some people mistake me for being Indian. I do have an Indian ancestor because my great grandmother comes from Cavite. Centuries ago, when the British docked in Cavite, their Indian slaves escaped and intermarried with the locals. There is also a large population of Indians here in the Philippines. When I searched for India in my blog, there were several posts that came up, but I don’t remember mentioning India in these posts.
There are groups that have this worse than we do. Apart form Christopher Reeve after his accident, how many disabled characters are played by disabled actors?
Easing the toughened moments,
(770): Just applied online. Cant stop hiccupping. May be drunk. Hope they liked my smiley faces.
To enter for your chance to win one of two copies of City of Thieves by Ellen Renner, just leave a comment in the comments section of this post.
We had a wonderful Wisconsin dinner that night. Grass fed pork from the local food co-op, grilled and drizzled with home jarred honey, dandelion fritters, and dandelion greens topped with hard boiled eggs from my chickens. And to wash it down, homemade lemonade that the kids helped me make. The kids loved dinner. When my husband came home I fed him his dinner without telling him what he was eating. (He already thinks I’m crazy remember?) He chowed down on the salad and instantly knew that the little bits of fried goodness came from the backyard. He ate them though. His favorite was the salad. He gave me a hard time for foraging from the back yard, but in the end he thought it was pretty cool. Thanks to Billy Joe Tatum’s Wild Foods Cookbook dinner was a success.
“If the Cascadia Subduction Zone were to rupture today with the same magnitude as it did in 1700, both the quake and tsunami would cause unimaginable destruction across the entire Pacific Northwest, devastating such major cities as Seattle, Olympia, Tacoma, Portland, Victoria and Vancouver, B.C...
For all the noise and shenningans where the scuzzy recordings may hide it, at the heart of it all, Bo Coach knew how to write really good songs that were smart yet playful. When you remove the fuzz and actually be able to discern the melodies and structure, "Mannequin" is a brilliant song. And perhaps I have an advantage because I was able to hear them perform this live sans poor production values. But even songs like "Construction Paper Princess" is an absolutely marvelous song that nearly brings me to tears every time. "Uncle Roy" is smart, playful, and is certainly unique. And "Fast One" is a quintessential suburban indie rock ripper. One of my biggest regrets in my life is misplacing the original master tapes of the original recordings of "Mannequin" and "Welcome Citizens" as I would've love to share those with everyone today. Heck, just one more listen would do me right. I don't think anyone back then ever thought myself or anyone would ever archive this stuff.
Criminal charges against TMPD deputy chief formalised
Between 1982 and 193, Björk earned a crust playing a Jupiter synthesiser in Cactus, a bar-room cover version group, which survived two summer seasons playing 70s hits to Iceland's heavy weekend drinkers in the south of the country. No known recordings exist.
They turned their backs on the man and found, much to their annoyance, that they had reached a road junction. Decisions, decisions, decisions. Why were they all of a sudden limping on two different opinions? They knew exactly which direction O’Connor’s farm was. This was not the first time they had been directed there.
Someone once said to me that my father leave my mom, my sister and me with no responsibility and no regrets, i have learned that i don’t want to be like him. I know i am failed to maintain my marriage, but this is certainly not my decisions and i had tried to fix it many time until i founded that this is not about how to maintain or to fix, this is about her life, i am admitted thaw “We_parents” too selfish to ignore her; that she’s deserve to have a parents completely.
Air has to come out the tires, as much as possible, so that the tires just about stay on the rims. A most frequently neglected necessity to avoid being stuck.
Lexie's Creations Anthing goes
Before the weekend even started, I'd driven on a field trip and grocery shopped on Wednesday, had lunch with a dear friend, took the school staff holiday photo, went to therapy and yoga, and made cake pops on Thursday.
4.) Send photos of the room that are clear of clutter, and show clear shots of all angles of the room.
I hate to disappoint people. It's a fundamental piece of who I am. I would rather "go without" or compromise my own preferences than to put someone else out. That may the core reason why I rarely entertain. Really, only those in my closest circle visit me where I live. People for whom I am certain I can provide and relaxing and enjoyable visit. People that are comfortable enough to walk over to my refrigerator for something to drink and not be offended if I don't catch their empty glass in time to do it myself. People who will take me seriously when I say "the snacks are here and here and here so please rifle through any time you're feeling munchy," because I mean it. I am a grazer and there is nothing worse than being a little hungry when you're in someone else's home and not being able to grab a snack when you need one.
”A surprisingly small part of what I write is made up,” said the spider to the fly, thus confusing it into immobility. Rhetorical spiders don´t need webs.
Today’s pin challenge is one of those “Duh” things followed by, “Oh! Sweet!” I’ve been testing the theory on all brands, not just Reynolds wrap for their “lock-in tabs” and these exist on every single plastic wrap or aluminum foil box you find. First of all, it’s kind of ridiculous that my entire life I never knew about this. As for the boxes I have, there are NO directions or talk about lock-in tabs. Granted, the box speaks German to me so I have no idea what it’s saying but I’m pretty sure it doesn’t tell me about this tip! Yes, it talks to me.
Once again the circus was in town to pamper the head-clown and, once again, the average citizen of that barren wasteland got to sit outside the pearly gates and starve while, no doubt, the fat, lazy and defunct hit the buffet like there was no tomorrow. No doubt there were plenty of chicken wings to throw at each other while Robert made a complete ass of himself, again.
And not too long ago I found a baby squirrel that had fallen out of it's nest in my backyard. Today the baby came back to visit me. Pookie was not happy, but it was really sweet. I think I have a new outdoor pet, along with bunny who visits frequently.
#S-7 Holly Boland
This one looked cute with it…
"You know I really hate repeats."
On either side the river lie
The details of Panini America’s surprise USA Baseball content in 2011 Limited . . .
However, sharing services where that means job cuts will have deflationary implications for local economies as much as this will attack the workers made redundant as a result. This sort of attack will cut across attempts to build political unity between Labour Councils and the local labour movement to take on the Coalition Government.
Thomas Edward Galvin, 32, New York, N.Y.
Independent Retailer of the Year
He also totally redrew this map of access to God!! He talked to and touched Gentiles – lepers – and bad people. And all kinds of ritually unclean people touched him!
A fire
Red (used Patons Astra Hot Red)
So people will begin to understand the true power and possibilities that we all are gratefully given at birth.
One element is missing, however. The Hulk’s rampages are only engaging if you give a damn about the man inside the monster. Eric Norton is a wonderful, intense actor. He can plumb the depths of character that other actors fail to even reference. What he is not, however, is a likeable everyman. The point of his character in Fight Club is that he’s a little “off” despite his mundane surroundings. That character, much like Norton’s Banner, is never a character we can like and empathise with. He’s just a little too “off”; too intense. It’s a criticism that hadn’t occurred to me until I saw Ruffalo’s performance in The Avengers.
I knew straight away that the basic 'dandelion clock' would be fairly easy to create in beadwork and I set about using a combination of Swarovski crystal pearls and seed beads to get the look I wanted.
I often tell my young audiences 'I have the best job in the world'
Balance is a funny thing. People talk about how important it is, although some say true balance doesn't exist and striving to find balance is the point itself.
All my life, I have wanted to be a writer, so I think that it is time for me to stop dreaming about it and saying one day…one day…one day.
Naming is a complex and foundational topic but we can start by realizing a few concepts. In Genesis 2 God gives humankind the task of naming the animals. About this act Leon Kass, a Jewish professor of Sociology at the University of Chicago in his book The Beginning of Wisdom: Reading Genesis, states:
Now it's your turn! What are your favorites?
The EU and weather modification is NOT a wild theory though.
Aaaany who…
But who knows...I guess we shall see!
I am also going to try to add a lot more pictures to the blog, since that’s what I enjoy on blogs when I go to look at them.
Prosecutors said the women were held as virtual hostages, forced to have sex with clients in hotel rooms, apartments and even the back of their captors’ taxis in exchange for just enough cash to survive. One victim was even made to get a barcode tattoo, prosecutors said.
My salvation was discovering that transcribing even the most overused idea into a foreign setting and language makes it feel fresh and new again. Take, for example, Ne le dit á personne, the film version of Harlan Coben’s Tell No One. The perfectly serviceable source material is transformed into something altogether edgier and interesting by its Gallic makeover.
It seems about 1,200 people, mostly young folks, were arrested for rioting-related causes in London earlier this dog-month of August. I don’t know too much about London, that’s for sure. But where I’m from, August is the hottest month of the year.
On this day in 1922, Charlie Robertson threw the first perfect game for the Chicago White Sox at Navin Field in Detroit, Michigan, against the Tigers.
Studies around the country have shown that less affluent communities tend to have high levels of obese and overweight residents. And New York City is no exception. According to the data, 60 percent of adults in East Harlem and Central Harlem are either overweight or obese. And less than 10 percent of Harlem residents eat the recommended servings of fruits and vegetables.
James V. DeBlase, 45, Manalapan, N.J.
This is how I assembled my matchbox.
“Here — a vivid example. Buttocks of almost all men are not erogenous, in contrast to the same body parts in women.
Shopping on the web is with Pixmania asking for nothing but problems. Their customer service, if it exists at all, is terrible (not existing) and can as such being considered the worst customer service.
Flowers!
Ear piercing is cute, but the giant holes that people put in their ears in hard for me to understand. I was standing in line behind a guy in the airport, and the only thing I noticed were the huge gaping holes he had in his ears. It was gross.
I’d like to go back to when we first met. You won the Authonomy Live event at York Festival of Writing and were swamped by agents as soon as you stepped from the stage. There's a perception that this was a sort of magical 'right place, right time' occurrence, but I know that your authorial journey up to that point had been longer and more arduous than that might suggest. Can you tell us a bit about that?
Soon we were at the local bar. I ordered a round, but it took ages. Vinnie came up to let me know everyone left to go smoke and that he wants to go upstairs (in the 3 story bar). It’s 2a.m. and I’m running on two days of no sleep. Upstairs, I put my head on his shoulder and he put his arm is around me. Looks like I didn’t erase thoroughly, I guesstimate my chances are 50%.
Wayne Rooney
I sat with this guy on the sofa and talked. And have to say that I had a really good time. Not even once I worried about my looks.
5) Christopher Meloni is going to be in True Blood? Stabler as a vampire? I’m interested in how this will play out… Now he can really show those perps what he thinks of them!
-The quantity of the Iron depends on the gender and the age; during pregnancy and breast feeding the quantity needed is 15mg per day. During their “period”, because there is a loss of 25 to 250mg of Iron per day, women must consume 300mg of Iron per day. Food rich in Iron includes: meat 3.5%; liver 6.7%; eggs 2.5%; prunes 3.2%; spinach 3%; grains 2.5%.
Often times to recount an entire trip would seem utterly unnecessary, but for many reasons I do believe this past week long vacation in San Juan, Puerto Rico is very deserving of such details.
Bulldozer Painting:
I realize I should have just baked them a second batch of cookies, but I didn't have enough butter or chocolate chips. I usually have more than enough stuff to bake several types/batches of cookies, but the weather has not been baking weather so I allowed my stores to diminish.
This is me and Alan, Fridaymans newest member on the last night, again alcohol was aplenty. I don't like this picture but Lisa tells me off for not posting recent pictures of me!
2. Why do you feel it’s time for an updated NICNT volume on Hebrews? (And what does it feel like to walk a mile in the literary shoes of the late F. F. Bruce?)
Joel Knight – Calico Black, Calico Blue
The random access memory storage space for the normal hardware settings would bе 1 gigabyte оf space. The ultra settings wоuld be double thе normal hardware settings аnd be two gigabytes.To process thе data quickly enоugh fоr the normal gaming experience the Central Processing Unit speed would be at the minimum one thousand, ѕix hundred megahertz. For thе ultra settings it ѕhоuld be abоve one thousand еight hundred megahertz.
With an unemployment rate of emigration of younger people to maintain a decent living, so many activities and this is making selling a bit more desirable, especially in light of the north dakota snowmobile dealer and towns in this casinos by winning big. There are also several great restaurants to dine at and it was introduced into the north dakota snowmobile dealer of the north dakota snowmobile dealer to other states.
explore who I really am, since it's clear to me that somehow along the way I lost, or hid, a lot of who I am,
Apparently, according to my mother, in my teens I used to gallivant around the town. ‘Up to
VL: All of these independent community kingdoms related to each other through marriage. That’s how you broker alliances—how you gain more power and access to luxury goods, land, and crops. While most of this region was conquered by the Aztecs in the late fifteenth century, the Zapotecs are able to maintain control of cacao production—an important ingredient in chocolate, the drink of the nobility—through a negotiated marriage between a Zapotec prince and an Aztec princess. Similarly, when the Spaniards arrive, these indigenous nobles make alliances and become an integral part of the new world economy—emerging in a new role of caciques, who functioned as intermediaries among the Spanish clergy, the Spanish officials, and the indigenous communities.
* Puzzles
Although the original adult sweater was designed for women, I definitely think that the
Amy and I discussed late into the night what was happening and what we are going to do about it. It dawned on us that we have no access to guns. I have a hand gun in the states, but the hell I went through at the border about owning a gun that I left in Utah gave me no desire to bother with any kind of gun, since guns make you evil for whatever reasons.
Allen is also set to discuss our progress with Afghan security forces. He will talk about provinces handed over to Afghan control and the successes of our allies, who have deployed tens of thousands of troops to the fight.
I liked advertising, but I LOVED design. I fell completely in love with the idea of creating something unique and brand new and being able to call it my own. It challenged me to think outside the box and look at things in a whole new way. Now, instead of reading a simple magazine, or looking at someone’s business card or website, I tear it apart into how it represents design. I start saying, “Oh that typeface is a dafont font that I’ve used before” or “man that logo text could really use some kearning.” Its so much fun! I couldn’t watch a commercial without asking myself, “I wonder who their target market is?” or “wow, I hate the way that box of cereal is packaged, so I’m gonna buy that one because it looks like a fifth grader designed the other one that’s cheaper.” (huge problem I have. I refuse to buy ugly products.) Ceriously haha. Who wants to by that ugly Great Value cereal, when you have that awesomely designed fruit loop box staring at you. Just “food” for thought. Man, my sense of humor is awesome right?
Ferentz Lafargue (Songs in the Key of My Life)
of the flock
I will be uploading the details and printables for Life Size Clue within the next few days. Keep your eyes open! It took FOREVER to create, but was completely worth it. Hopefully it will involve less prep time the second time around!
Who walk the streets as free men now
'Am really cross still,' I mutter from side of mouth.
A lot of the children I work with do not have loving caring parents who help them feel safe, cared for, and understood. Their parents are in crisis and they cannot be there for their children. When I help these children create what they envision in my Art Therapy studio it gives them that deep need for connection. Creating together tells them that they are heard, seen and cared for by an adult. It helps them develop empathy on a somatic level.
Yeah. I have great social skills. In this case though, it turned out okay. Actually, better than okay.
Tropical Leanings (details were added)
Roky Erickson & The Aliens: White Faces
A close second is Low Life: The Deal. A sublime Dreddworld offering from 2011 by Rob Williams and D'israeli. I loved it.
If you scuba dive, you know these gentlemen; even paramedics are taught their laws when learning about diving-related emergencies.
This paperback edition presents these perspicacious essays to a new readership, and shows the richness and complexity of H. P. Lovecraft’s writing-writing that is destined to endure for centuries. Citations to Lovecraft’s work have been updated to reflect newer and more accurate editions that have appeared since 1991, and some of the essays have been revised in other particulars.
committing the act.
To register complaints about the noise, call 311. It helps to identify the helicopters, if possible. This shouldn't be too hard, some of them seemed to be flying at an altitude of only a few hundred feet.
Outside the Courtroom and in the presence of two legal professionals, Mr. Roopnarine also allegedly misappropriated the facts of circumstances in the ongoing custody matter. He was also heard pleading that his daughter was a humble school teacher and that Mr. Ramsajan’s actions were preventing her from being able to work.
paton's basic beanie - version one (man size)
When I wear somthing that I've just made, I usually am not very concious about it. But with this new sweater, I was so happy with the execution and the outcome in general that I was hoping that people would say something about it. That did not happen: maybe because it is a nice, but not a super special sweater. I've been wearing it almost non stop because it goes so well with the rest of my self made wardrobe. Or at least with my mustard skirt and the folded mini skirts.
I intend to color it in Photoshop eventually, but I don’t know how long it’ll be until that happens.
I moderate comments on this blog and I’m not going to get into topical discussions on any sites where comments are not moderated. Of course, when I say that X is mansplaining, X might think that he’s just stating obvious truths that I’ve failed to understand. That is why I don’t see how websites with comment sections might breach contentious issues and discuss them productively without an aggressive moderator who, moreover, has to take sides from time to time. And that is why I don’t think that we can have genuinely contentious but still productive exchanges on general purpose websites where no one in particular takes responsibility for the content. A good discussion section on a blog is probably the best we can hope for.
I’d always been interested in the question “What is your favorite movie?” and found my answer changing based on my tastes and my mood. This, of course, is natural, but I also wondered how I would rank the movies based solely on my gut reaction to it at the very moment I saw it, so I started at the very start of the year, and listed each movie I saw as I saw it. Each time I added a movie, I placed it within the list based on where it ranked among the other movies at the time I saw it. It was easy, because I didn’t have to evaluate each movie at the same time. I was exceptionally pleased with how the list came out, and I think it’s an interesting way to rank them.
It also makes me wonder how all this relates to how on earth this queasy woman survived as a clinical photographer for 3 months? And loved it?? I guess I was just in photographer mode, surveying the scene not part of it. Maybe I need to put on my clinical photographer hat next time I need to deal with one of these post-drama clean ups...
This is a deviation from the hitherto valid rule that the exercise of due diligence does not require controlling the correct execution of individual and specific directives given to assistants who had proven to be reliable before.
From the perspective of the order of man, we understand how we are to do things is according to the structures created by man. From the perspective of the order of God, we understand how we are to do things is according to the structures created by God.
5) Growth
Because I think my esteemed commenters don't get enough recognition for the contributions they make to this modest blog, I have decided to start a new weekly feature, "Swift Reactions," which will focus on some of the more interesting comments, emails and mentions of my blog in the blogosphere that you may have missed. So, without further ado, here is this week's inaugural edition of "Swift Reactions":
The last time I saw him was in hospital soon after his stroke. He couldn't talk properly, and let me tell you, this man could talk underwater with a mouthful of marbles, so not being able to was bad enough in itself, let alone the fact he couldn't swallow properly, move his left hand much or even shuffle to the bathroom. And let's add the cancer eating away at his bones while we're at it.
In a predominantly secular society which has seen the need to go to church diminish over time, it is clearly no longer viable for the church-goers themselves to foot the bill for maintaining their antique buildings. They are too few. Ironically, with this as a background I am aware that splinter groups continue to form, insisting that they are Christian but want to worship in their own (not Cof E) way. One such has opened a new church in what used to be a corporate social club on the outskirts of Cheltenham. They have done so with a view to the "church" building serving as a general community centre when not being used for worship. I've no idea whether this will work, but it does seem more positive than watching your debts grow while praying for a subsidy or a generous patron.
And the night went on and it was fiery and gorgeous and perfect as such a thing can be.
… but minutes later (on the next page), after receiving a note from Vittorio to say that he was popping round …
Christmas Gifts to buy
However, when taking stock of our spiritual achievements, one cannot escape the dismal thought that not only are we light years away from our goal, but the trajectory of our efforts is not even directed towards spiritual greatness - let alone perfection.
this is a really cute josei with a bit of a supernatural twist.
The animals ate the pineapple.
Next, scramble the eggs, add the milk and cook. Set the scrambled eggs in the bowl with the breakfast sausage.
was a Staffordshire physician, Thomas Fowler, who in 1786 turned the using arsenic as medicine, into a science. He published a book of his research (or rather observations!) titled, "Medical Reports of the Effects of Arsenic", in which he agreed strongly for the use of arsenic in sick people. One such
For us, unschooling has always boiled down to relationships, and we have kept good relationships as our sacred priority, and this has informed all of our decisions and choices. This has not necessarily been intentional, though. We have found respectful, joyful relationships to be a natural outcome of traveling this radical unschooling path. And, how could it not? When the goal is joy in each moment, then it stands to reason that each moment will be joyful. Or will, at least, tend towards joy. If joy is our goal, we will natural choose thoughts, words, and deeds that will lead us to more joyful moments. And, I have found that doing this has created a culture of kindness in our home. That is not to say that conflicts don't arise; of course, they do. But, in a culture of kindness, each member strives towards finding a compassionate solution to conflict. I know that this may sound kind of airy-fairy and other worldly; it is anything but. We are not perfect, and we don't float around the house. We are simply committed to each other's wholeness.
Barbie dolls were a huge part of my childhood, I just wish I could have been a child for a little longer.
I have seen a draft copy of the exhaust positioning rules. These rules are still subject to change because of an ongoing Technical Working Group (TWG) discussion to refine the rules. Ross Brawn in particular has made comments about possible loopholes in these regs.
I walked on the plane inside of 40 minutes unshaven, head to toe in ASAT camo with five corporate executives all in suits. Waiting and smiling.
He smiles when he comes to some bits. He looks at Tracey, and asks (as he does each time), "Did you help with this?"
I suppose that motherhood helps cultivate the quality of patience. All of that waiting, all of that forced stillness -- as you let a child learn to dress herself, or sound out the letters of a word, or eat a meal with a clumsy knife and fork and a dreamy disinterest in the plate’s contents. And that’s not to mention piano scales, or ballet practice, or all those many hours waiting in a car for someone else to finish. But still, I am childishly impatient – and I have learned to always carry a book, so that I can be entertained – so that I can escape.
1. Is the proposed legislation grandstanding/pandering? Sure. But one person's "pandering" is another's "responding to community needs." It's no secret that people haven't been happy about attempts to rename neighborhoods (not just in Crown Heights but across the city), particularly when they feel that re-naming is part of a top-down, broker-led process to expedite neighborhood change and de-legitimize the claims of longtime residents to the neighborhood. There's also often a racial component to this type of re-naming, as Nostrand Park covered a few weeks back (linked above). So maybe Hakeem's making noise for the cameras, but it hardly seems a stretch that people in his district would be wary of developer-led neighborhood change, particularly in light of the Atlantic Yards situation and general gentrification. So let's read his proposal sympathetically, which brings me to point number two.
The hunters also visited the Stanley Hotel in Estes Park, a perennial favorite on the show.
San Francisco CA 94133
_________________________________________
On the first Sunday we commemorate the triumph of true worship, the Sunday of Orthodoxy. This historical event, the restoration of icons for use in the Church, affirms that our journey is not alone, but as a pilgrim Church together. I don’t follow my own feelings or decisions, but place myself in the company of the faithful in the Church.
I placed their hands like that in this portrait because often I find they play such a vital role and say so much.
Sa - 20 easy
I will see you guys all next time. Goodnight everyone.
Glue Dots
Trivia Compiled By: Ken Hulsey
All in all it my time spent in Vegas was an amazing and enriching experience. Professionally, I learned more than I could have hoped for. Personally, I overcame some personal challenges of maintaining my balanced body on the road. I also found areas of improvement for next time.
Every year, I also await the arrival of their Celebration Ale...especially the on-tap version. In the Kansas City area, look for it to be on tap (in mid-December) at possibly: Barley's, Grinders, or Flying Saucer.
What in the name of God are they talking about?
2) Which is sort of related (smart writing about books — on the Internet!) to another thing: this recent, incredibly smart piece in Salon, examining Franzen v. Internet (for the record, I’m on the Internet’s team) and giving the best defense I’ve read yet on what the Internet has brought to the world of books and readers. It’s so good I’m going to quote from it at length. But you should still go and read the whole piece. And follow the links in the first excerpt.
Or too old to change
On the nose – Delightful! Old coins and leather with a hint of treacle.
This place was not that difficult to shoot. First of all the illumination was almost even. I just used matrix metering and meter the scene at the center and did some test shots. I settled with 1/20 seconds. Second, I set manual focus to infinity, everything up to infinity will be in focus. Third, I then I took 8 shots panned from left to right. Fourth, I just let Adobe Photoshop do it’s magic.
Te-Erika Patterson has done all of that and more. Women of G+ was fortunate enough to interview Te-Erika about the amazing projects she has been part of and find out what new projects are on the horizon. She’s also going to be available for a hangout (INSERT DATE AND TIME HERE) so bring your questions and join in the fun.
The local provincial ANC-MEC for social development Weziwe Thusi ( +27 033 341 9600) condemned the murder of the Dutch woman 'in the strongest terms'.
It is funny that only good people die---well it seems that every service I have heard focuses on the goodness of a persons life.
astral body is emotions, and associated with out of body experiences. It is connected to the body via a chord and is responsible for sleeping and dreaming with magnetic attributes attracts/repels
What makes this film so effective is due to the psychological aspect of the story. The paranoia slowly develops in the company of these men while trust diminishes. These characters are nicely setup from the start establishing their relationships and personalities so vividly that later you see how seamlessly the alien has infiltrated their ranks. No one acts any differently, and it is surprising how complete the disguise is. Under a human guise, the Thing turns down the chance to take over as the leader of the group. The life form is not looking to be obvious. It has no ego, and is possibly doing this out of fear for its own survival. It wants to hide, be subversive so that it can keep doing what it does without suspicion. Using covert methods, it can slowly take over the entire camp until it is in total control. However, when threatened, it is a brilliant idea that each part of it is an individual whole that will fight for its own survival. This makes it just that much harder to definitively defeat as even one molecule’s survival can be disastrous, in time. Mixed in with the diverse and dimensional performances, every aspect of paranoia and fear that this film deserved is greatly fleshed out and realized here.
25ml freshly squeezed lime juice
Your Angels Boston and Americus
Remove batter from refrigerator. Divide batter into just slightly smaller than golf ball size balls ( should make about 8-10 .
Peeved: Oh no you don’t. I’m mad at you too. You were not wearing your listening ears. Mommy told you to sit in the stroller and what did you do? You skootched halfway across the store. I look away for one second and you’re over in Petites walking around with the stroller hanging off your butt. When we get home, it’s dinner and bed for you. No show tonight. Biggie, it’s homework and bed for you, too. Give me any lip and I’ll take away your electronics for a week.
When I took the first bite after mixing, the first texture I felt was a strange grittiness. It was still pretty smooth and thick like a Greek yogurt should be, but the thickness stuck to the back of my throat a bit and the grittiness stuck to my teeth even after a few minutes. What would you call that? After-texture?
8:00 – Borrowed Eyes, Cavedweller, Gregory Stovetop, Racetrack @ Bruar Falls Free (21+)
Happy Sunday stampers! It is time for another challenge from Stampin' Sisters in Christ. This week's hostess is the blog founder Kris, who selected this verse Colossians 1:27b "...Christ in you, the hope of glory". Her challenge for this week is to use something transparent, acetate, vellum, etc., somewhere on your card. And our sponsor this week is Serendipity, the source of the toadstool and leaves image in my card. Such detailed, lovely stamps, you can find the company web site right here. I had lots of fun coloring this image.
as I’m sure you’ve gathered, its been a VERY rough few days…the last three days I have consistently had breakdowns every day, of a rather serious nature, been having a LOT of problems mentally and I’m just NOT coping well (I’ll make it…some how…not sure how but we’ll plow through like we always do)…if I can get photos of any reasonable resolution w/my camera I’ll show you what it results in (I suppose its better than cutting if only it because it doesn’t lead to blood loss and/or a need for stitches…a terrible habit I had in high school…a work place accident brought on by one of these such break downs that nearly lost me my left thumb ended my cutting days, thankfully I still have the thumb obviously).
A great example of a graceful response to a negative experience, is the one that Conan O'Brian gave on his leaving NBC...
After which, she goes back to sleep with 100% accuracy.
In the same PPA article Ian Eckert, project director at Abacus e-Media said:
BLITZER: I’ll give you 30 seconds, Mr. Speaker. PAUL: … cut the spending. And they talk about these new programs and all, but how many of the other candidates are willing to cut anything? I’m willing to cut $1 trillion out of the first year.
The hummingbirds are starting to visit again.
furniture we already had in the house (we repainted the tea cart in lilac to
Yet who among us does not need
I started out with mostly soul music, 80′s and 90′s. Then, I shifted more into hip-hop.
The idea behind A Taste Of The Extraordinary is to bring to life the thing that makes Drambuie unique - its taste. It's still made to a secret recipe, taking a selection of malt whiskies from Speyside and the Highlands and blending them with spices, heather honey and herbs. But obviously with this being the world of premium alcoholic drinks, it's about much more than pure tangible product points - imbuing it with a sense of mystery and desirability is vital to get people to even consider it.
So now I'm back in the hostel boarded up in my sarcophogus recharging for the final day. I've heard Beck and now Radiohead playing at the bar downstairs, so it must be the coolest fucking bar in town.
The jihad is a global conception that divides the peoples of the world into two irreconcilable camps: that of the dar al-Harb, the “Territory of War,” which covers those regions controlled by the infidels; and the dar al-Islam, “the Territory of Islam,” the Muslim homeland where Islamic law reigns. The jihad is the normal and permanent state of war between the Muslims and the dar al-Harb, a war that can only end with the final domination over unbelievers and the absolute supremacy of Islam throughout the world.
Back On Shelves
Stampin Up- Ticket Corner Punch, Pink Pirouette ribbon, Stampendous white embossing powder,
As you can see, I decided to use the mortarboard for a shaped card. The one I used comes from the Cricut cartridge "Wrap It Up." The next photos show the back of the card where you can see the fold where the front and back are attached, and also the inside where the front is folded back.
Dr. Bartlett lives with three other men in a unique house in London. Abbie is invited to a few dinner parties, and begins to suspect there's more to these gentlemen than first appears. She also keeps seeing a symbol - a chalice with Latin words -- in several different places, and feels it has something to do with these men.
cleaning up our yard.
Is your company engaging in Sustainability or Cause Marketing missions? If so, what are they?
And when tragedy happens to someone else, I'm reminded of that ocean of fear that can bubble so close to the surface.
Poor old Sid Barrett never saw that line, or recognised the safety to be found on the other side of it.
I would be a fool to try and go against His system.
I have been involved in the politics of Lambeth and its local authority for a quarter of a century. I was living in the borough when the Ted Knight administration took on the Thatcher Government. I supported them then and think today they were right to fight against that appalling reactionary shower. Had Labour local authorities stuck together in 1985 in the struggle against ratecapping there might never have been a third term Tory Government (we shall never know).
1/4 cup finely chopped onions
Oh, you know me! I'm a read-a-long addict! Our next read-a-long happens in June and it's going to be pretty epic. You know that Jen - that'd be me - and the rest of the chicks are kinda nuts and the Zombie Queen herself is participating in this event of awesomeness! So, you better all be back. Hopefully by June my participation will be more on the dot. A girl can hope! :)
Please don't direct your questions at me. I'm not a dentist afterall so I'm not qualified to answer. And I don't know the costs, please just call them!
Oh, and just for the record, the skirts I would have chosen for the female Nazis would have been black with a smallish slit in the back. As far as length goes, I would say, oh, about ten centimetres above the knee. I think that would allow you to commit unspeakable atrocities and still look chic at the same time.
as I listen to its yeses and no’s,
Today, I offer an example of the kind of work I hope to share here on a regular basis this season. File this one under both “teacher” and “daddy.” As a boy growing up in the Eighties, I learned United States geography through college basketball conference affiliation. Some glorious weekend in October, Dick Vitale’s College Basketball Yearbook would hit the local drugstore’s magazine rack, and I would giddily grab it and run to my mother yelling “It’s here today! Can I get it?!” She always said “Yes,” and the stat-ogling would begin. When I grew tired of marveling at how many points Reggie Miller or Reggie Williams averaged or at the size of the Carrier Dome or at the enrollment at Texas, I moved on to drawing uniforms and mascots. Eventually, at some point, this rural Kentucky boy would dig up a map of the United States and hunt for places like Corvallis, Oregon, or Lafayette, Louisiana. I made it a point to know all of the Division I teams, their colors, and their mascots.
I’ll agree with the one who posts this video in saying that I didn’t expect both the OP and ED of this new anime series sound so soothing. Kyoto Animation does not fail to impress, really. The ED is especially nice in creating that dreamy atmosphere with a good rhythm and visuals.
Who do I want to be?
La Roche Posay Lipikar Bath Oil... marvellous for sensitive skins and those times when perfumed products are out... She recommends this range for anyone who has a delicate skin ...
I reiterate our call for, inter-alia, the immediate ending of the state of emergency and the freeing of all - and not only some - political prisoners.
Next dispose of the eggshell and wash your hand, without getting your prized book wet. It helps if you have pump soap.
With the large amount of frosting between layers, the addition of plump cherries, and the fact that I didn't do a great job of centering the top layer, there was a huge gap between layers. This gap led to sides that weren't perfectly straight. I must say that I've found that people are not at all interested in hearing your monologue about all the things that are wrong with the cake--they just want you to shut up, slice into the cake, and serve them some.
Julie, 53, of Waterlooville, Hants, added: “Fifteen pups is too many for one mum. If Liliana wasn’t there I’d have to bottle-feed some.”
I did make up for it during the week though! Ive been eating good and hitting the gym (except for Wednesday, felt to "womanly" and opted for a cozy afternoon in bed taking a nap)
He is to attend an ‘event’ and his son’s graduation in London this month before taking a family holiday in Spain.
Ask Him to fill you with the kind of love only He can provide, then purpose to give it to your mate in a way that reflects your gratefulness to God for loving you. That’s the beauty of redeeming love. That’s the power of faithfulness.
Ancient events can cause
If you know my husband you would know that he calls himself a music snob. That is a fitting name for him. Keep in mind that being a music snob does not actually make you smart when it comes to music. Some of the music he listens to just isnt good. Not to me anyway. Thats the point of this blog. Every song that you hear on the radio is a great song, to somebody.
Readers can find our useful, up-to-the-minute information in many online locations today!
Hambly screen prints transparency and rubons (crown and wings)
Enfys: My card is BIG - 8 x8 and I printed the carol singers from Magical Winter to fit, and added quite a wide ribbon. I used glitter letter stickers to spell out the words on their songsheets, and gave them all a pompom on their hats. The inked edges are dark green chalk ink - looks a bit brown in the photo......
Today I am delegated to peanut butter sandwich and flask making duty before following on for the first Match of the Day.
Father Michael Oswalt is the first priest I know of to be absolutely, not conditionally, ordained in the Traditional Rite by a Bishop consecrated in the Traditional Rite after he was originally ordained in the Novus Ordo by a Novus Ordo-consecrated Bishop. While it has never been, nor will it begin to be now, the raison d'etre of this website to comment on sacramental theology, it must be widely acknowledged that the dirty little secret of most Trads is that they have massive doubts about the new sacraments (what this implies for the possibility of an erring Magisterium and the logical consequences in their minds is something we'll sidestep for now). The SSPX has most visibly expressed this doubt not just through their numerous conditional ordinations of Novus Ordo priests, but through many thousands of conditional confirmations (for which no canonical investigation is required for you to present yourself for conditional confirmation). What I think is fascinating about Fr. Oswalt's interview(s) (I met him in 2009, before he walked down this road) is seeing just how the "Tradversion" story that we all experienced was seen through his eyes.
then when we've first begun.
1 teaspoon sugar (I used Splenda)
Spend some time working on your business and not in it this week. Workshop these questions with your executive team or your one-man army. A breakthrough could be right around the corner for you, and when you have it…share it with us!
or perhaps she has died in the night?’
Such Is Life follows Melissa Jones as she visits the small town in Pennsylvania where she grew up. Homecomings can often be bittersweet. Melissa’s heart remains in the country, but living and working in New York City for several years has certainly given her a whole new way of looking at her roots.
Transfer half of the batter to the prepared baking pan and spread in an even layer. Bake for 20 minutes. Transfer the pan to a wire rack and let cool for 20 minutes. Maintain oven temperature.
Many of my family members ( myself, included ) share the trait of laughing
Serves 10
Here's a close-up of each one:
It was impossible that our life, which had been estranged from God, should of itself return to the high and heavenly place.
rejecting applicants, I find that your rejection does not meet my needs at
As much as I'm impressed with Jack's analysis (not to mention the fact that he's like a machine when it comes to this stuff)what really is special to me is that he not only took the time to go through all of the rigamaroll to do the tests, but he then wrote to me about it. Me—dumb old me. I'm honestly flattered by his efforts.
The ‘we’ addressed in the advertisement is clearly not the entire WE. Not all who are Canadian share the portrayed heritage and it’s interesting as citizens WHAT we are expected to adopt – a “love” of the Olympics and a “love” of ‘OUR’ nation’s history. We will not move forward if we continue to stagnate around these issues.
The pirates demand a crippling twenty billion dollar ransom for her release. Complicated political and diplomatic considerations render the civilized major powers incapable of intervening. When Hazel is given evidence of the horrific torture which Cayla is being subjected to, she calls on Hector Cross to help her rescue her daughter. Hector is the owner and operator of Cross Bow Security, the company which is contracted to Bannock Oil to provide all their security. He is a formidable fighting man. Between them Hazel and Hector are determined to take the law into their own hands.
Dear Lord,You know who visits my blog. I pray for each one of them, for the pain they carry, and perhaps for the voice they no longer have. I pray you will infect their hearts today and give them a pep in their step. In Jesus Name, Amen.
I'm looking forward to seeing the new Andy Garcia movie, For Greater Glory, based on the revolt of Catholics in Mexico against the radical socialist and atheist regime of President Plutarco Elías Calles in the 1920s. Ed Morrissey discusses the film over at Hot Air (check out the trailer there).
Crisp, sleek, golden reimagining by Findlay Brown.
Lesson 3: There are a lot of lessons to be learned in the course of doing a triathlon and as a complete noob, reading an article or discussing certain aspects with more experienced triathletes can help shave mountains of time from the completion time and also help finish races feeling good.
Freeze in your ice cream maker according to their instructions. Place in containers and finishing freezing in the freezer.
Anyway I'm off to sunbathe while I can, have a lovely week!
That’s because 4 years ago, when I was 18, I was raped. It’s not something I talk about, or even write about, often. But it occurred to me that if all of this talk about rape in the news had left me feeling vulnerable and triggered, surely someone else felt it too. So I want to use this post to talk about the psychological effects of rape, from my own standpoint.
Acts 22:17
let alone plead to
In Spain the average distance traveled by car per person is 18,837 in 2005 and is project to shoot back over 25,000 in 2010 due to increased fuel efficency. Spain has 19,524,000 cars on the road(2004) with the number of roads increasing to fit the demand. As of 2006 there were over 4000 accidents a year in Spain which is down form previous years 9000 in (1990) so safety issues are being addressed.
How come so many rpg parties set something on fire, steal stuff or start breaking and entering? I was just earlier this week, or the week before (I don't remember) listening to a podcast where someone suggested it's always just a matter of time before the PC set something on fire. It didn't take long for one of my players to suggest it. But, instead they trespassed on private property doing some old school breaking and entering.
and their award-winning products are beyond awesome.
placed in a line that, though it couldn’t be reconnoitered,
8. We are also happy to announce that Barnes and Noble named The Scorch Trials as one of the 10 Best Teen Books of 2010! Check it out: CLICK HERE.
Getting off that tangent, I'm continuing to post recipes from the Cucina49 Chrismukkah, which peaked with a large dinner party on Christmas Day. There were two menorahs a-blazing, competitive dreidel-spinning (our friend Nick always wins--he's got the technique down), David's brightly shining Christmas tree and, of course, lots of good food, including a decidedly non-kosher charcuterie platter.
Preheat the oven to 130°C/gas mk ½. Line a baking sheet with baking parchment.
17. Assholeparade - Launch Ramp
I am still feeling rather fragile. I do not sleep well, waking at all hours of the night, I am tense during the day and prone to tears... Oh my God this sounds awful. I know I am not depressed. I did the depression thing after having our daughters and was absolutely 'out-of-it'.
Brooke joined us from Amarillo when we got to our hotel. We wanted to go and see the Albuquerque Temple. However, there weren't enough seats in Mom's car, so Karlee sat on the floor. We looked like a bunch of clowns piling out of a car in the circus!
Chaplins father had died of drink by the time he was 10, and his mother unable to bear the poverty she endured, suffered from bouts of insanity, deep experiences that never left him. He himself was an voracious reader on economic theory and philosophical treatise.A strong humanitarian he was disturbed by the rise of nationalism and the social effects of the Depression, of unemployment and of automation, and hatred of the mechanisation of the world and even devised his own Economic Solution, based on a more equitable not just of wealth but of work.
I have decided that I am going to just start posting these Funnies on Fridays. Here we go -- the funnies from the last seven days.
The lovely Miss Dibs is holding a giveaway for a really fun printed fabric! It has lobsters on it!!! I just love that! The giveaway is for 2 meters of this fabric. The giveaway will end on Sunday 12th February at midnight, London time, and she will announce a winner on Monday 13th. If you are interested in winning this fabric (2metres), leave a comment on the Dibs and the Machine giveaway post stating what you are grateful for. It does not have to be sewing related. Just anything that fills you with gratitude. Thanks Dibs for hosting this great giveaway!
for we must ask, that is
The acting is great too, and of course now I am mad keen on visiting that part of the world for a look around. Which is on the agenda for 'sometime' as we have just booked a midweek break for 2 nights on the Isle Of Wight...which I am looking forward to.......no need for subtitles there eh?
I’ll ajar doors open
The nice thing about trimming down instead of trying to get the correct dimensions on the first try is that you ALWAYS have the size that you need and it is accurate.
06 - Satisfied Man 04:41
Enjoy alongside your favorite side dishes. I have also used this for shredded chicken that I needed for a Chili recipe...to be shared later.
Teri said she'd like to live there, but her friend said she'd really have to downsize alot and get rid of lots of knick knacks. We think there would be enough room for us, though. Here's some of the photos she took.
Looking to see if the title of the previous had been taken, I stumbled across this poem and for a moment my breath was taken away. I know nothing of the poet, and I realize that my own translation is too literal and too close to the original--too crude. But I hope it gives a little sense of the beauty that captured me as I stumbled through my morning routine.
The first four miles were on narrow-ish bridleways around a park and golf course, and I found I was stuck in traffic a lot with slower runners, so adopted a burst - easy - burst -easy approach to passing, using the verges and edges of the fields as much as I could. After four kilometers or so things started to thin out a bit just as I got onto the wider road section. I grabbed a cup of water at 4.5 kilometers and had a couple of sips.
But, I have no regrets that my time was not spent with a paint brush in my hand. Instead, I met some wonderful new people while showing a new listing of mine and spending some time with my mother on Saturday afternoon. And Saturday night was wonderful with both of the boys here for hamburgers cooked on the grill. Sunday? Well, Sunday is actually a blur of resting and being somewhat lazy, throwing in a few loads of laundry here and there, and making a Herculean effort to push the painting project out of my mind. It was one of those "lost days" where you have trouble recalling what you even did! Do you ever have those?
Gilroy said consumers will find locally grown apples pricey and difficult to find this fall. Some kinds of apples such as Empire will be very difficult to find.
Love, Ash, Dan, and, yes..... BD. Baby Dashlee. Who is no longer future.
“Many company’s treat the tablet as more of a toy than a piece of hardware that needs the same support and security measures in place as its PCs,” he notes.
“Preach the word; be instant in season, out of season; reprove, rebuke, exhort with all longsuffering and doctrine.”
In that big list of C words we gave in the post How Will You Speak on Social Media? you may have noticed that context wasn’t exactly way up there in the standings. It’s puzzling how many social media list-makers leave out context. We think it’s very important, perhaps even paramount, and certainly one of the things that makes social networking a unique medium.
zoe touched my head and asked in a concerned voice, "mommy are you ok?!"
I lost my shit when I hung up the phone. I cried hard in a fit of pure self-pity. I went to the coffee shop and sat feeling very sorry for myself, that I had somehow let Helen down terribly. I posted on facebook, without explanation, that I was weepy, that I'd crossed over the long-treaded lucky-line into full blown incompetence, that maybe I was feeble-minded.
I used Flourishes "Apple of My Eye" because my inspiration image has Apple Blossoms. I colored my apples in with Copics and double heat embossed them for a shiny look so it wouldn't look dull next to the clear and shiny transparency overlay from MME, placed over a Pink Paisley paper. The frame is also from MME and the blinged out ruffled ribbon is from Prima. I used some extra butterflies left over from a topiary I made for Brigette's birthday, where I used velum, a pearl and an image pattern from Flourishes "Fanciful Flourishes" stamp set.
So, how is Design My Diggs going to work? At any point in time - YOU may message ME at ambiance.decor@live.ca to submit photos of a room that you'd like to have redesigned. Whether that be a bathroom, bedroom, family room, kitchen, etc. I will go through those photos and choose a winner - I am undecided on how often I am going to offer this - but we'll see how it goes! We'll be starting this series after Christmas! Once I have chosen a room, I will put together a full online Design Board just for you! Along with sourcing for all of the products featured on the Board.
One thing's for certain: I'm going to have to get that e-reader.
I'm so excited! I'm thinking about making the HP cake for when the new movie comes out! I'm looking for a decently healthy recipe that I can smother with not at all healthy icing! haha!! It's all a balancing act, right?
Today we get a sleep in for the first time in a week! It is great. We get up and have a shower and have breakfast. We then head out to the markets. I have brought some items to send home, so Rico wants to do the same. I buy a few things for myself today. Rico buys himself a t-shirt. I buy myself an alpaca woollen hat an alpaca woollen jersey and a bag! Now i look like a local! Rico likes my jersey, so decides to buy one too. While we are going through the market we come up to the Witches Market. Here you can buy llama foetuses. It is really good luck to buy a foetuses and bury them under your first house for good luck. We then have lunch. I order vegetable soup 10 Bs (NZ 2) and a large plate of fries for 12 Bs (NZ 2.50). Rico orders a toasted sandwich for 10 Bs and we get a litre of coca-cola for 10 Bs. It is really yummy! After lunch we decide to go to the Museo de la Coca (the cocaine museum). It costs 10 Bs to enter (NZ 2). It is a really informative museum. It describes how coca leaves have been used for centuries and how it was originally a medical wonder drug used for anaesthetics. We also learnt about how cocaine was used in the manufacturing of coca-cola until 1915. The coca leaves are still used in the manufacturing of coca-cola for the taste. After this we decided to head into the main plaza of the city. Here there is another cathedral which is just as impressive as the first one we saw yesterday. Also at this plaza is the presidential palace. It is an amazing building. The only negative about this plaza is the pigeons. There are thousands of them! We then met up with Tom and Lewis to go out for dinner. We go to a place called the Star of India. It is the Indian restaurant in Bolivia. I get butter chicken, rice and a garlic naan bread and a glass of red wine for 80 Bs (NZ 16). Rico gets the Rogan Josh. Lewis opts for the hottest dish in the restaurant which is the Vindaloo. If you can finish your whole plate, you get a t-shirt. It takes him twice as long as us, but he finally finishes his meal. We each try a bit and it is very VERY hot. We then call it a night and head back to the hostel for a quite night. We again watch a dvd on the computer since we still cant manage to get onto the internet.
The Director’s recommendation is based on the report of the SRA 103 Boundary Review Committee, two dozen parents and community members who met with HDSB staff and trustees every week through the winter months earlier this year. Fifteen different scenarios were considered and shared with school communities by these reps, and eventually narrowed down to three. A public information meeting was held Thursday, April 7 at Iroquois Ridge High School to share information with the community about the boundary review process and the scenarios. Documents relating to the public meeting are available on the HDSB SRA 103 High School webpage.
Me, "No."
previous night, the Spurs would capitalize on a few too many Warriors' late mistakes, despite being out-shot 52% to 44%. Patty Mills was again the hero as he bested his new career-high from last night by 7. He had 34 pts., 12 asst., and 5 boards in 43 solid minutes. DeJuan Blair & James Anderson followed with 22 & 19. It was Mills' two straight threes with the score tied at 95, and about 5 minutes left, that would ultimately do in the Warriors on this last day of the regular season. The Spurs' 107-101 WIN was the 10th straight win, as we were not only the only team with a double digit winning streak this season, but we wrapped it up in style with THREE of them (11, 11, 10). Here is the boxscore..
I printed the body of the book on a Gestetner machine and had the cover (of my own design) printed by a Brandon company. I think the textured orange card was free and they just charged me for the printing. I sold a few, very few and the rest moldered away in our various garages over the decades until one fateful garbage day number 4 when Prism Prisons achieved its ultimate purpose, its destiny - landfill!
The DHS review is in addition to an internal probe the Secret Service is already conducting as well as a military investigation into U.S. troops linked to the controversy.
I lay awake at night thinking and praying over kids. I cry over situations with my own children. I hunt down children who haven't turned in their work and send other young men into the bathroom to smoke them out of their hiding places. I work hard to put comments on their report cards and then rewrite the PowerSchool report cards when I realize that I was so tired I put the comments on the wrong period.
Baking soda- 1/2 tsp
It’s 25 days and a few hours until we leave on this crazy adventure! One of the biggest tasks we had to complete was finding our transportation: bikes. After all it would be hard to bike across the country without them. We started out with Jordan. He had saved up enough from working through the school year to buy a brand new bike. After getting several opinions from several bike stores we ended up at Global Bikes in Chandler. There, the friendly and knowledgable staff helped Jordan to pick out the Specialized cruX Elite. We both were in love with the bike leaving the store, and the next day, Jordan went back and made the purchase.
"Yet there are things you would have me to do, as well. Help me to pray for them faithfully, fervently, intelligently, and daily. May I keep Your Word ever before them in every way possible. Help me to know how best to instruct them, and give me the opportunities and the words to do so. Help me and my husband to continue to maintain the standards in our home that will guard them from the world during any time they spend with us.
A few quick phone calls and its decided were going to take our film camera to Llanelli and ask them exactly why they cant face the public on their own merits without using the BNP as a smokescreen in the hope we will all forget about the expenses scandal brewing away daily.
Technically, the Governor was not a governor. He had merely instituted himself as the leader of a group of refugees who had joined forces to survive. The Governor had cemented his role as leader through violence. He arrived one day with a handful of seedy looking characters who literally beat everyone else into submission on his behalf. The Governor and his minions lived like kings taking whatever they wanted whenever they wanted it and forcing the other inhabitants of the high school building where they resided to work for them as if they were indentured servants.
Even better, there are some great little boutiques dotted along the coastline, and we spent an hour in a vintage shop yesterday, trawling through their wares. Sadly, I didn't find what I was looking for (a 1940s-50s cotton dress), but P's dad managed to pick up some wing tip collars for a song. Later, as we were trawling through Aldeburgh, I came across this sweet floral dress and just had to have it, as I have a christening coming up and nothing to wear...
Piece of wood at Joann's :: $5
Four months after US President Barack Obama authorized the US military to indefinitely detain American citizens without charge or trial, lawmakers in Virginia have voted to refuse to abidy by the provision of the NDAA.
"I'll hold you to that." He smiled and put his hand out between the bars. A bubble formed on it, swelling to a little more than head-sized. "You may want to come a little closer. I can't make it as large as I'd like here." His voice sounded strained already. Probably just the Stable Rods upstairs, unless his Gift was really weak.
The dictionary defines ether as the rarefied element of the Heavens. Ether is a medium. It permeates all space and transmits waves of energy in a wide range of frequencies, from cell phones to human auras. What is “ethereal” is related to the regions beyond earth: the heavens.
Most of Bland's savage Texas blues sides during the mid- to late '50s featured the slashing guitar of Clarence Hollimon, notably "I Smell Trouble," "I Don't Believe," "Don't Want No Woman," "You Got Me (Where You Want Me)," and the torrid "Loan a Helping Hand" and "Teach Me (How to Love You)." But the insistent guitar riffs guiding Bland's first national hit, 1957's driving "Farther Up the Road," were contributed by Pat Hare, another vicious picker who would eventually die in prison after murdering his girlfriend and a cop. Later, Wayne Bennett took over on guitar, his elegant fretwork prominent on Bland's Duke waxings throughout much of the '60s.
The hospitality shown by Ellen and her fabulous staff was superb, we couldn't have asked for better. I can't wait to go back and teach later in the year.
As long as I can remember I have loved winter. All the moments of the natural year have their unique music, fragrance and pigments, from the first Spring Peeper to the last violet Aster of November, but the colder months I relish most. It’s the robust chill and storms, rugged well-worn garments of winter clothing, hearty soups and stews. Invigorating walks deep into the empty forest, tracks in the snow, the icy filigree of rocks and streams. I love the subtle colors, textures of the dormant land, the softer light and shadows. Stripped of summer foliage, now the mountains show us their true shapes—hard ridges and soft purple hollows—the skeletal bones of our tough and weathered topography.
If it wasn't for the Maitre D I'm sure the night would not have been so enjoyable as it was. Sue was able to practice her French with the Maitre D who had a wonderful sense of humour.
Day Thirty-Nine Thursday April 26 (Inca Trail day four)
Jacob M. Myers, I and Ii Esdras: Introduction, Translation and Commentary, The Anchor Bible (Garden City, NJ: Doubleday, 1974).
It took the kid a while to respond. He was still getting over the shock of the whole thing. New people, new job, new planet. Shit can be tough.
For those concerned about Stewie he’s doing perfectly fine now and we still joke, about it to this day.
There's so much I wish you could tell me. How much air do I put in the tires? Do fans use less electricity than the AC? Which one is the Phillips head? Was I 8 or 9 years old when I told you I thought I was pregnant? You loved Pittsburgh but thought Detroit should win the Cup, didn't you? Does Mom like hydrangeas? Can you still see us?
on saturday while larry was hiking, i met some girl friends for lunch.
Arianna’s Entry:
This Biblical mandate is based on the fact that we belong to Jesus Christ. We belong to Him for we are bought with a price and the result, according to 1 Corinthians 6:21 is to “glorify God in your body, and in your spirit, which are God’s.”
It is so important that kids learn these things from a young age. I was very encouraged to be able to watch this with them and see them really get some of these deep truths. The foundation is important because without a firm foundation the building (person) falls. If we want to do something about seeing lives changed by the power of God’s Word, we need to teach it to our kids. This type of DVD series is helping parents do this with their children and it even helps adults learn some information about the Bible. I know that a lot of adults would say that we can’t teach kids such heavy topics like sin, judgement and what the Pentateuch is, but my kids are all under 8 years old and they were enjoying it.
We think we know how to run our lives – how to be the fishermen of our own experience. But yet we keep doing the very same thing over and over and wonder why we keep getting the same dismal results. We hear God in our hearts suggesting that we try the other side of the boat of our experience but we write him off as not knowing anything about our lives! Sometimes we get the courage to try something new and are amazed at the results.
Sunday January 31st, 6pm
The top 3 (in no particular order) are.....
Another 19th century scientist I've recruited is Dmitri Ivanovsky, the Russian biologist who first identified viruses. The Dutch scientist Beijerinck is usually credited with the discovery of viruses - but he did eventually concede Ivanovsky's prior claim. So I made Ivanovsky a modest man who is kind and helpful, unassuming and self-effacing. He's also rather fragile - as he looks in this photo. Maybe he wasn't like that - maybe he was very cross that Beijerinck got the credit first off, and should have been motivated by bitterness. But I don't read Russian, and there don't seem to be any accounts of Ivanovsky's character in languages I do read, so I reckon he's fair game. He and Pasteur are foils to Ignace's ruthlessness.
Gladys Knight and Tristan McManus did thee cha-cha. Damn, she's just a few months younger than I am. I sure couldn't do that. She got a standing ovation and deserved it. Score: 8, 7, 8 = 23.
“One, two, three…”
We were in Florida with Brent's family to celebrate Thanksgiving. Grammy treated us to a trip to Zoo World. It was awesome, but I kid you not... there was a tiger that wanted to eat Mr. Jenkins.
- It is entirely possible that I could have a GIRL (a really, really bad reason, but if I am going to be perfectly honest, this possibility is the only reason that the NOs haven't already won by a landslide).
Bill Clinton, for example, has already upped his net worth to $38 million -- and the big fella never even did that lucrative McDonald's ad campaign we all expected him to cash in on.
Let me know if you want to preregister and I'll send you the form. To make a tax-deductible donation, send your check to:
“The data show no discernible difference in bearing wear between when we started and when we finished,” remarked Dan DeLong. “I call that a success.”
Community Worker Thulani Pike says: "We are shocked but at the same time we are not suprised about this because it's been going on, police brutality in our community."
If Found: Beware, she will do anything to protect Palin. Ask her why she isn't doing anything to stop the eradication of her beloved marmot that's going on now, from Sud Island north of Kodiak. Contact the Legislative Budget and Audit committee (which she is a member of) to find out why the Matanuska Creamery audit/investigation has been stalled.
A second hand house that knew love, that has grown children and felt loss, beauty and anger, resolution of conflict and acceptance of life. A house became a home and is reaching out now for acceptance as a new home. A space where harmonics of bird and bee sing the shadows into gentle blankets for sleep and renewal. A space where light streams grace and creativity up into the highest corners of the ceiling and spreads among the arches, gliding along their curves with the laughter of a child on a yellow slide.
They are called conjugated linoleic acids (CLAs), and have been a recent buzzword in the grazing/sustainable livestock raising communities. I want to give a shout-out to University of Wisconsin Madison for discovering these compounds in 1979 when they applied beef extract to mice skin and noticed their anticarcinogenic effects. Although they didn’t pin down exactly what was causing the effects, they certainly got the ball rolling. CLAs are also reported to fight cardiovascular disease, inflammation, and has positive effects on weight management. A trans fat that is found in animal tissue that helps people lose weight? Can you see how this just gets confusing?
I'm glad I backed this project on Kickstarter. It's been interesting to watch, and lovely to participate in the creation of a brand new rpg in the spirit of the games that got me into the hobby. Many thanks to Alex, Tavis, Greg and all my fellow backers for making ACKS happen!
No intelligent student of the Bible believes that a person is a member of God’s Church because that person has joined some denominational organization. But every such student knows that God’s way of joining God’s Church is told in 1 Corinthians 12:12-13, “For as the body is one and hath many members, and all the members of that one body, being many, are one body; SO ALSO IS CHRIST: For by one Spirit are we all baptized into ONE BODY.”
the men likewise gave up natural relations with women and were consumed with
If you are looking for a brush with the locals, check out the Bywater neighborhood. It’s a hike from the French Quarter but gives you a good perspective of the varying neighborhoods of New Orleans. Art and coffee shops pepper the streets. If you need an iced latte and a sandwich, stop at Sound Cafe at 2700 Chartres Street, which is between the Bywater and Marigny Districts. If you need a place to rest you feet, Mimi’s in the Marigny is full of locals and an excellent break on your way to the Bywater District. Located at 2601 Royal Street, they serve a nice selection of beers and cold tapas in the afternoon.
into a mixed-media metaphor
A job isn't just a job. It can be where you spend almost all of your time. You are giving all your time away for what, exactly?
Crikey, I’m actually enjoying this season quite a bit. The drama has improved as a result of actions having consequences, and it gives the jokes a bit more depth. It is funny again. Edie Falco continues to be excellent in the lead role. Not sure why Zoey was at the fair with Jackie and the kids at the beginning of the episode but it was amusing enough. We have more potential drama with Jackie’s rehab friend being the new boss’s son, and with Kevin getting information about Jackie’s addiction and threatening to take the kids. Rosie Perez was also very good as the pregnant looking tumour girl. Things are going on, this show is good again.
Later in fall 2010, there will be some more outdoor bike art at city hall. Some bike themed mandalas will be installed at Vancouver city hall’s community garden, thanks to Jamie Ollivier’s summer 2010, Cycleback Art Outreach Program. This summer program, sponsored by the city, was targeted for the Mount Pleasant area and homeless.
More women rasing hell on stage!
* Exile on Main Street Blues by various artists. First of all, this compilation has absolutely nothing to do with the classic Rolling Stones album -- except perhaps for the fact that Exile on Main Street has a deep spiritual debt to the kind of old blues songs found here and that I bet the Stones as individuals would personally dig most, perhaps all, the songs here.
Lord of the Rings Online was a potential, and is a favorite of mine, but only four of us played it over the summer, and we had already made it into the 30s. To effectively add in the fifth player would mean starting fresh again. As much as I like Middle-earth, even I am not sure I want to run through the Lone Lands yet again.
Now you too can suffer from heat exhaustion as you wander the overly sunny streets of Mos Eisley looking for droids in full body armour, take a ride on Jabba's Sail Barge (no, not THAT kind of ride, you filthy degenerate. Okay, wait, apparently THAT kind of ride is available too, carry on), or just spend a weekend unwinding by killing a few tribes of Sand People.
Now, that is not to knock anyone who enjoys playing tieflings. Truth be told, Joe could have been playing anything and it would have been irritating (especially considering he was toting around a vorpal blade of all things). My point here being Joe turned me off of the setting years ago because he was a munchkin, and due to my naivety I presumed that if Joe=munchkin playing tiefling from Planescape then Planescape must=cheesy power gamer setting. Having the chance to look back at it now and review some of the material I've found for it, I hate that I never gave it a shot, because it rocks...a lot.
If education was the key things should have been very different in SA, had they not burned down their own schools at such a rate that the NP Government could not keep up restoring the damaged class-rooms. Those that did receive education ended up as great leaders, entrepreneurs, academics, business people, etc. Speak to someone like Prof. Mogotlane (http://web.up.ac.za/default.asp?ipkCategoryID=17&language=0) and ask him his opinion as to the standard of education during Apartheid vs today and ask him why he thinks blacks do not have education and why they claim not to have received proper education during the Apartheid years. I worked with him and I would enjoy some ignorant liberal taking him on about it, because even his students tried it while we were working at MEDUNSA in the 1980's.
Guess Again
I shot the nude 5 months before she came down!
3. Make service the aim. Considering the shabby treatment that many Malaysians receive at government departments, including the police, it is clear that the concept of service is alien to many civil servants. They exist for the public, not the other way around, and their assessment must include how well they satisfy the public in the performance of their service. This leads us naturally to our next point.
There was one food item that Thomas was willing to discuss: The lead agent from Mrs. Obama's Secret Service detail came in and ordered twelve of the same sandwich to dine on, he said. That was the chicken breast served with Swiss cheese, mayonnaise, tomato and smoked bacon on a kaiser roll, which is $6.25.
Although DH doesn’t help much with his comments about my fat ass and wobbly legs oh and the cellulite.
“But it’s so boring!”
"If I had magic powers, I'd make you feel better," I said at one point.
Estimate $4,000-6,000
The solution? Creatives should be at the heart of the process from the beginning, they should take the client's brief, and interrogate it directly. By their nature, naturally good creative advertising people have the ability to take on this information and keep the detachment needed to see the real problems, and also look at it from a punter's point of view. Only the modern stylist has a problem with this. Creatives should be fully involved in and responsible for coming up with a great strategy. They should be involved all the way through, pitching the idea to the client, making it, and feeling responsibility for it working. That's how you get great advertising. Take the great George Lois as an example, George attacks the client's problem head on with his energy and creativity. And you can see it in it his work. It's extremely strong, yet you clearly know that it's there to do a job, to get a result.
Troi D: Why is Bill Murray so awesome?
No don't treat me like a baby
For if you do, I shall be forced to claim
Anyway, so I brought the Biscoff spread home and waited approximately .7 seconds before grabbing a spoon and giving it a taste. Verdict: tastes like the cookies. Good. Not better than Nutella, but good.
He is patient with you,
Absolute Write
The ruffle effect is made with punching 1 inch strips of Pacific Point card stock and 1 inch strips of Beyond the Garden DSP (Designer Series Paper).
We talked awhile Sunday night, and got together again Monday night to continue. The main takeaway was encouragement; while he thinks Romney will lose and Obama will be re-elected (and I tend to agree), he also feels confident that the worst is behind us; government will remain divided and so nothing much bad will be enacted; also, nothing much good either.
This session Rep. Morgan of Prague successfully created a Vulnerable Adult Intervention Task Force via Senate Bill 1601. The task force will study how to best provide interdisciplinary community assistance, intervention, and referral services for persons with mental or physical illnesses or disabilities, dementia or other related disease or condition. Speaker Chris Benge has appointed Terry Humphrey to serve on this task force.
Black Sheep -lamb hand print craft - I left this activity how it is instead of making the sheep all black because it's just so cute, however to stick to the book you could color the cotton balls with paint or marker
Strong in voice, and with some great descriptions that aren’t over the top or out of character for Honor, the writing is as notable as the characters and plot of this one. Though relatively low in word count, this book packs a punch throughout and will keep readers guessing not only at what other secrets Rusty might hold but whether the pair will find Kyra Kelly as they’re intending.
The event itself consisted mostly of short talks by those who knew Diana well, in her personal or professional life (and often both): her sisters and her sons; her editors and agent; fans, friends, translators... There were also clips from the adaptations of her work: Miyazaki’s animated Howl’s Moving Castle, the BBC dramatization of Archer’s Goon, and even an excerpt from the ballet of Black Maria written by her nephew, Tom Armstrong. As is the way of such events, laughter and tears were never far away or far apart. In the end, I believe we approached Diana from enough angles that we managed by a process of - not triangulation, perhaps, but polygonization? - to conjure her, if in a fitful way like a Star Wars hologram. It was the kind of event where one thought, "I wish Diana
Only when you are doing everything you can to get something done, that is the time your prayers will be answered.
Rapunzel has 70 feet of golden magical hair that has healing powers. Her guardian, Mother Gothel, stole her as a baby because she wanted to stay young and beautiful forever. The flower that did the same thing was taken from her and given to Rapunzel's mother as a remedy, passing the power on to her daughter. She tried to cut off Rapunzel's hair, but it loses its magical properties and becomes useless. Rapunzel is now a young adult and reasonably would like to see the floating lights that happen every year on her birthday. Mother Gothel refuses to let her go, even if it's for her birthday, and explodes in true evil stepmother fashion. Meanwhile, Flynn Rider steals a crown from the royal family, ditches his accomplices, and hides in Rapunzel's tower. She subdues him and plans to show her mother she can handle herself, but Mother Gothel explosion ensues before she can show anything. Instead, Rapunzel asks for paints that take 3 days to get so she can force Flynn to take her to see the floating lights. Her journey with Flynn Rider will take her places she has never been and change her life forever.
Those sentiments are probably very familiar to many of alt.adoption’s citizens, as we’ve heard them many times. Other phrases that might ring bells are ‘why disrupt all those lives?’, ‘why open up a can of worms?’ ‘why rock the boat?’, or another quote from “Lost and Found”, “I don’t think there could be a more selfish quest than this.” (p.75)
Thirteen business and 89 homes were destroyed, according to CTM.
Ysidro Hidalgo-Tejada, 47, New York, N.Y., Dominican Republic
One thing that I love about books is their indefinability. You know, we love to label things -- books being no exceptions. This book is YA, this book is sci fi, this book is for adults -- you know the drill. But every once in a while you come across a book that seems shareable amongst all readers. Or, you know, at least crosses that boundary between the YA audience and the adult world.
This led me to look for a radio station which focused on comedy 24/7. The research wasn't very successful. A lot of stations I found were based in America and because of my location in the UK, I was unable to tune in to most of them. I then started to look at podcasts. It seemed that the American's offered numerous podcasts to download, but those I managed to get hold of weren't that funny! Maybe its a difference in sense of humour, which I don't believe as I find Scrubs and Two and a Half Men funny, but nothing was grabbing my attention - not even Nobody Likes Onions, what is meant to be one of the funniest podcasts available.
24 year old Dong Zhi Hong (董志鸿) graduated from Shenyang University in 2009 and came to study his Masters in Nanyang Technological University on a Singapore government scholarship which required him to work in Singapore for three years upon graduation.
Bhotoe
6) Start and join discussions online. Ahem. I may be a bit biased towards this one, because I’m a blogger, but really – Star Wars blogs and news sites would be nothing without the fans! Whether it’s starting a thread on a forum, or leading a discussion in a Star Wars/Sci-fi Chat room, you are a part of cultivating the fan base! I can’t tell you how thrilling it is to receive comments on things I post as a blogger, and there’s nothing more fun than being a ‘social butterfly’ about the things you love. Why do you think conventions are so popular? Social + what you love = AWESOME!
After the Christians are taken up into heaven, how do you think the disappearance of millions of people from the earth is going to be explained? Satan has already worked that one out. Most people believe that UFO’s contain people from outer space. I believe they are created by and contain demonic beings from outer space–not humans! Remember that Satan is the “prince of the power of the air.” Satan is now setting the stage to explain the disappearance of the Christians. He is still the god of this world and is deceiving people. Why are there so many stories of angelic visitations now? Notice that people who have angelic visitations almost always end up worshipping the angels. The Bible warns us that Satan is also transformed into an “angel of light.” Worshipping the creature (angels) more than the Creator is not of God, but of Satan.
Because of their brutal upbringing, the youths from The Sanctuary have talents and willpower far beyond those in the outside world. It was really entertaining to read about their escapades in this world where everything is new to them, even women whom they've never seen before.
For most of this series, I wrote about the good that comes with new beginnings. Today I thought I would talk about the growing pains and tough parts of starting over. When I was a little girl, I used to have bad cramps in my legs, growing pains as they are called. (My youngest sister had a much rougher time, she would cry to the point of screaming...it got so bad.) At the time I didn't understand, I just knew I was in pain. The pain was necessary for my growth physically. This works the same way with growing mentally and spiritually.
On the bottom part I have used the silver embossed metallic paper first and again edged with a decorative border. I then used a white embossed card using the CARAMELLO folder and this was added onto a black pearlised card base. It was adhered using 3D pads. Onto this I added two decorative cornerpieces cut in silver mirror card, and then black gemstones in the opposite corners. Finally I added a lovely black and white fabric bow.
Are the Darlingtons hoping to find 18-year-old Maggie a wealthy husband? Is that why newly moneyed Teddy Fitzhugh, whose father recently drowned in the sinking of the Titanic, has been invited to stay? His visit-and the complete change in Maggie’s personality since her return from a year abroad in France-gives the ever-curious staff even more reason to gossip than usual.
NICHOL KL. Preventing influenza: The physician’s role. Semin Respir Infect 1992; 7: 71-77.
It has inspired me to bring a little of that outdoor magic into our family room...
Good morning all you lovely people I have to start by saying I'm so sorry I've not been around - it's the time of year when work takes over my life again and even more so with the lovely weather. It should all settle down again after Easter though I do hope I can get around to visiting you all before then!
13. Combine with canned tuna to make tuna salad
Perhaps it was, but in a baseball hungry town, especially in the Mets hey-day, you don’t say that, even if you think it! Senor Solly was a little bitter in his analysis of McReynolds, saying “I hope he was a better hunter than hitter.”
Nobody asks why people feel they must leave their homes. International finance requires war to expand its markets. Impoverishing and destroying nations is big business. The ability to then use those who flee the afflicted countries, to undermine the West, is an added bonus.
Reading the news lately has been interesting.
So, it seems to me that we need to pick the bones out of this.
Pickles N Ammo and the Hamburgler joined the masses:
Lee said, “A majority of players who come here will want to play professional baseball and we want to make sure that when they enter professional baseball they have the best possible chance of being successful. It is not just about saying that ‘Hey, I played professional baseball’, it’s about giving the players a chance to be successful.”
Welcome back everyone.
Cheese of your choise (I like using asiago or pepper jack)
As Gary and Walter head to pick up Mary, they and the the town break out into a very catchy tune, “Life’s a Happy Song,” setting the tone for a nice sprinkling of musical numbers throughout the film. There’s old songs (“The Rainbow Connection,” “The Muppet Show Theme”), new songs (“Pictures in My Head,” “Life’s a Happy Song,” “Man or Muppet”), and non-Muppet songs (“We Built This City,” “Me and Julio Down by the Schoolyard”). Director James Bobin sprinkles the songs perfectly through the film, and Bret McKenzie’s new songs deliver exactly what each scene needs.
A branch of Mahayana Buddhism, often called Lamaism, as practiced inTibetbefore the brutal Chinese suppression, is still popular in Ladakh.
It was about at this point that Mike felt like something was off, so he went to Google to confirm his suspicions. You see, from Mike's experience with decking, he was always told to add a 1/8" gap between each board. This is accomplished by placing a nail between each board to give it the desired spacing. This is done so that the wood has room to expand without warping the decking. I'm not sure what made Mike stop and think about it, but, when does wood expand? When it's hot and wet. Like the 90 degree heat and the rainy weather we've had lately. Which means that the wood is pretty much at it's largest right now. Not to mention the fact that the wood is treated and full of chemicals. That means that as the deck ages, the wood will actually dry out and shrink, causing the what began as 1/8" gap to become even bigger. Like, small children will fall through and be lost forever, big. Okay not that big, but big enough to not look nice and for small things to fall through.
Then, because I had time to spare, I had my car inspected and FAILED. Remember that orange light I pointed out in this post? Well, I can't ignore it any longer, it appears.
Writing stories means that the story comes first, so that the writer cares first and foremost about the pacing, the plot, and the characters being real. Yes, there might be a message or two, but the author is not constantly reminding the reader–either through the dialogue or the narration–that there is a message in the story. Instead, the characters have the potential to represent something, but there is nothing in the story that directly states or describes it. Books with these kinds of characters or stories indirectly teach the readers through their actions, events, and responses to events. For example, Ella in Ella Enchanted by Gail Carson Levine is a strong young woman who fights a curse of absolute obedience. She could represent female empowerment. However, the book is not written about the empowerment of women, it is written to show how Ella overcomes the curse. The point of the book is the story about Ella’s adventures, not to send a message about women’s empowerment. It focuses more on developing Ella as a strong young woman than about showing Ella as such in order to tell the reader that women can be strong.
I was looking at Roni's blog and saw that she was creating a technique journal and adding calendar pages to each month. Not having anything else to create (uh huh) I decided to follow along. Instead of using a house template I chose to use Tim Holtz' vintage valise. The pages are embellished simply since the main focus should be the technique. Sometimes my results weren't quite the same but it was fun nonetheless. I bound my journal using the Cinch.
Rumor says Michelle Bachmann will get into the race and, having had Sarah Palin on the ticket in the last election, one might think that Republican enthusiasm for a woman candidate might have waned by now. Bachmann’s smart and articulate. She can’t win the White House.
This appeared in the Washington Post today. As Friendly Athiest points out headline of this piece is what was intended to be in the New York Times. See ‘It’s Time to Quit the Catholic Church’ Ad Appears in Washington Post
Add the fruit juices, chilies, tomatoes and tomatillos. Cook just long enough to warm the tomatoes and combine ingredients. Remove from heat and gently stir in mango and cilantro. Season with salt and pepper. Set aside
"As it stands, it was already a crying shame that it was necessary to approach the court to halt this clear manifestation of hate speech."
I now have six swarm traps out and placed and I really thought I would see a swarm this week but maybe the sudden colder temperatures have made the girls put off any swarming for a few days. I noticed several dying drones around the outter hives earlier this week. They were healthy looking and big drones with wings that glimmered nicely in the sunlight but they were obviously dying. I did a bit of research and discovered that this maybe a sign of a mating flight. I had always thought the mating flight took place away from the hives but several "experts" state that the drones will return to the hive to die after mating.
How Much Is Too Much?
Finally I thought about the social sense of accompanying, in the most traditional context I could think of.
Selection: Limited-Moderate. Not as many things and mostly 70's with some 40'-60's. Really great scarves though.
I would love to go to Turks and Caicos. T&C is made up for 40 different islands, but most people visit Providenciales, which is one of the more well-known islands (and, JetBlue flies there now!), as well as Grand Turk, which has a lot of Carribean history. The beaches are absolutely gorgeous. And I just looked at the March weather online, and it is mid-high eighties in T&C. So ideal.
with my little sister.' Then he looked again at the
Feel the pain of discrimination
Level 17: Mastery: +44%, Accuracy: +102.
The cupcakes are okay. I found them to be bland in taste. That’s great if you’re baking them for the kids, especially for our little picky eaters. For adults, they need an extra zip of spice.
who needs it, when you have the source?
When Rickey realized all that God had saved him from that day in the wrestling-match with the deputies, and thought about what Shane had been able to share with him, he suddenly saw that he had a story to share and a neighborhood full of people who needed to know that God is still in the business of saving people. So he got a copy of the police report that described the events of that evening, and went around to the homes of people he knew, one at a time, apologizing, telling his own story, and telling his friends what Jesus had done for him. A lot of the people he was talking to had known him for years, and Rickey felt that their reaction was to “wait and see” on this new change. They had seen him go through phases and do crazy things before—was this just one more? But Rickey understood that God was asking him to be faithful with what he had, and to continue to share what He had given him. Shane estimated that Rickey had shared his story and Jesus’ story with 100 people. Some days he went to the places where he used to buy meth and pot, some days he went to neighbors, family, and friends. Some days, like the day he went to “the store”, it was up to God to figure out whom he would talk to. But every day had now become both a challenge and an adventure.
Be well all!
… I was not immediately able to see these “antlers”, their shape changed according to the flight of my imagination. In order to better orient myself, I had to ask about their magnitude and extent. It turned out — about half a meter long, one symmetrical “horn” on each side. I had to be satisfied with this for the time being.
* Long story. But, yesterday I had a proud wife moment. My husband is awesome and so smart. He is a true advocate for his dear mom. And please say a prayer for her.
Favorite Flowers....daisies, I totally agree with Meg Ryan's character in You've Got Mail, they are just so friendly
When my focus was taken off of me and onto others, then I was able to experience the “Heart of God”. There is not one person that has not suffered some kind of loss and He wants to be our Comforter.
And I couldn't really talk so much about corsets without showing you guys the one I bought! It was the first of the display that I set eyes on, and I knew it had to be mine. I tried on a few, but this was the first one and I could tell immediately that it'd be the one I took home. They even had this same style and pattern in powder blue, but somehow I resisted and followed my gut with the chocolate brown one. It was definitely the right choice, because when I got home I put together a lovely mori-inspired coord for a meetup this weekend. I can't wait to show you guys! Anyone who's friends with me on facebook or follows my tumblr have seen a sneak preview of it, but everyone else will unfortunately have to wait until next week to see it!
A few weeks later, having heard nothing, about the fee, I queried via email. The reply came back - Oh sorry, we cant pay you without an electronic invoice."
8)Frequently remembering Allaah (Dhikr) which includes regularly reciting the Adhkar especially in the mornings and evenings
Collect 1 picture per idiom that displays what the words say and another picture that shows what the idiom means. Use your own classroom images for this or do a quick Google search for "idiom images".
Gunner for life.
Almost half way through my first 30 days of making conscious choices. I feel like I am doing better but I still have some areas where I know I need a little more work.
Independent living centers are also an alternative for people with special care needs. Most are located within established communities and owned and operated privately by individuals with disabilities. An independent living center offers its residents a space where they can be directly involved in maintaining their community while, at the same time, providing its residents with the support services they require.
I love my job. I love fighting for what I believe in. I love having fun while doing it. I love reporting stories that the Complex refuses to report. I love fighting back, I love finding allies, and—famously—I enjoy making enemies.
So, if you'd like to help WASTED win its very first prize, even if you've voted already, please vote! The idea is that the more enthusiastic the readers, the more often they will vote, so repetitive voting is what the organisers want. If you're not at a school you just put n/a in the school bit and you do not have to put your postcode, either.
In Iwate Prefecture, three small breweries have reported no damage, and are continuing operations as usual. However, Iwate Kura Beer has reported a ruptured fermentation tank, which will cause them to stop operations for about a month. However, there were no injuries to any personnel.
After all, every year without fail, Activision’s flagship title has created the kind of frenzy only usually seen when a new iPad or iPhone lands, with gamers willing to make like their iDevice-loving counterparts and queue for all hours to be among the first to get their hands on it.
* Aggregated news from departments and clubs in one place. Mary Washington University does this on WordPress I believe.
Clockwise from L-R (my excited face just before leaving the house; the floating flowers and patches on Pergola; “ihaw-ihaw” food trip with co-hikers; the “self-sikap” French braids)
They say Great Divide ain't gonna be exporting no more. I'm willing to donate one of the last bottles of this in the country to a local brewery for cloning purposes.
Twa: As every wean knows the heid yin o' the DINOSAURS!!!! was called Tyranasoreus Rex. Rex is, of course, auld Greek fur King. This basic fact confirms that the DINOSAURS!!! were monarchists, not republicans, so must have favoured the protestant ways.
There is so much energy and fun to be found on “Fatty Gets A Stylist.” After kicking off with the previously mentioned “Are You Ready?”, the album continues with “The Devil’s in the Details,” a pure dance track complete with banjo that recalls Rednex’s version of “Cotton Eye Joe.”
This kids are quite happy here and so are we. After two tumultuous years, it's nice to finally feel settled. I have a good group of friends, the kids are quite content and happy, my job is going gang busters (just got promoted to SVP), and Fen is happy with his job. We're in a good place.
Flare-Up! Moving, again – 3 different states
And there are the stakes! Yes yes yes!
Rachel decided to brave the heat.
They debate
MIMI- All I can say is to check her blog out. She is stylish, down to earth and kind. She shares sewing knowledge by posting great tutorials and most important she encourages beginner sewers to jump right into the sewing game by posting easy peasy tutorials.
For three months, he stayed with CPI-ML sympathizers, including a bricklayer in Munger. “One of the reasons for my return was the prospect of being asked to kill people,” he says. “We were a bunch of romantics who just didn’t know that we were being fed with lies.” Dipesh Chakrabarty, a Presidency College student of the 1960s who now teaches in University of Chicago, recalls: “Many urban youth who went to liberate rural areas came back after some weeks with acute bowel problems.”
A 4 game set with the Angels can be quite beneficial for the Jays as the Angels have been slumping to start the season. Brandon Morrow will start off tomorrow night and luckily the Jays will not have to face the Angel’s ace Jered Weaver. Stayed tuned for a pre game analysis before tomorrow nights game as for now we can sit back and enjoy a great series win by the Toronto Blue Jays!
Second, Jay Chiat took a trip to Great Britain and discovered account planning.
Imagine that city.
Anime Weekend Atlanta (AWA) is a Japanese Animation (Anime) & Comics (Manga) convention. AWA was first organized in 1994, with the first convention held in 1995. Since then, AWA has been recognized as one of the most popular Japanese Animation conventions in the United States, and one of the top ten attended anime conventions in North America.
Farther along we’ll understand why;
To me, everything was great as far as my athletic life was concerned until Dad filmed me running during one of my games. I remember watching the video on my couch at home that following evening and being mortified after watching myself. I looked awkward and goofy. It was a humbling experience watching myself pretend to be athletic.
This sauce is so good. Sooo good. And I don't even like mayonnaise. My family uses it for braised artichokes and for whole roasted or grilled fish. In this case, the combination of the tarragon in the fish with this rich sauce and the tartness and freshness from the farro salad make an unbelievable meal.
We shall have not a mite that at last we can hold.
First off, we do get at least an indication of where exactly this island Thisby might be. The protagonists of this little prizewinner are called capaill uisce (“water horses”), which sounds definitely Gaelic enough for the island to be situated near Ireland or Scotland, especially taking the incredibly detailed characterization of the angry wild sea and the roughness of the shoreline into consideration. Many books are either plot-driven or character-driven and in only a few instances you get the perfect combination of plot & character. The Scorpio Races, however, is really neither. If anything it is setting-driven. The descriptions of the island and the sea surrounding it, out of which these magnificently cruel beasts capaill uisce are born, are what should suck you in from the start. Stiefvater’s prose is vividly atmospheric, the perfect tool to paint an almost impressionist tale of a temperamental island and its long-standing traditions.
Sure there were granola-crunching hippies who meant well and tried to spread to me the word on harmful pesticides, fake-chemical foods, and SAVING OUR EARTH! That I found them too higher-than-thou to listen to was partly because they were so cultish, partly that they didn’t know how to get through to me, and partly that how I perceive them (nutty, party-pooping, etc.) was a result of how my environment conditioned me. At the end of the day, arrogant or not, I mean they meant well right? Obviously!
On watching a re-run of Steve Graham's 2009 documentary on Peter Green the other night, The Hat is reminded how scarce early or even quite recent footage is compared with today's overwhelming abundance. The search engines are full of wonderful but sadly short clips of ghosts from the past and more are coming to light all the time. But these days live performance, however indifferent, goes on video non-stop and is often released commercially within months or even days. It seems that every time Rhianna throws a bump or a grind it is turned into a full length feature film and money changes hands. Nevertheless, we should be grateful that something like the stunning line-up of talent for the Fender Strat 50th Anniversary Concert is filmed by someone who understands music and is available in high quality video in no time at all - even though we still have to hunt for early Aretha and Sister Rosetta. So I guess we should maybe raise a small glass to some of those film-makers, old and young and up-coming who seem to know what they are doing and love our music.
March 17 Alejandro Escovedo’s Taco Party at Maria’s Taco Express Austin TX mid-afternoon
First: I like nods to other Stephen King stories, but if you can’t even get the one you are making right, why don’t you spend more time on that instead of yelling to the fans ‘See, see, I love Stephen King, I’ve read his stuff, can’t you tell?’. There was more detail and work put into the viral website for Bag of Bones than you actually see in the film itself. If you really love Stephen King, your focus should be on bringing people who don’t know him into the world he created, and hopefully making them interested in reading the book. If I watched this movie without knowing the novel, I would have no desire to ever read it.
Who can call a spade a spade and cope up with the pulls and pressures that are such an integral part of the life after occupying the chair of the President? Well, there is only one brave heart who can set a new precedent by becoming the President of India. That person is none other than Mr. Lalit Modi.
I would take some time and make the obvious, “philanthropy/misanthropy” joke, but my smart readers will be turned off by the unoriginality of that joke, and my stupid readers will be thoroughly confused by multisyllabic words.
This week Avery will turn 18 months old.
Historical background
Caroline Street
1277 **D-V/15/1997. “Marcus Aurelius and the Limits of Stoicism.” Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(10), above, pp. 394-406.)
the "3 minute LA shit" he is referring to is, back in the glory days of the LA Harsh Noise scene (which is now nonexistent), tons of artists and groups mainly in the LA area that played short, blasting, violent, sets that well, lasted only a few minutes. No complaints from me though, That's just as long as they needed to be. And man, I miss seeing a good pit to a noise show. Too bad most of those mosh kids were "just a phase"-ers and now long gone. ugh.
hard things come up when the time comes.
i totally cried no less than 15 times.
2010 marks the 50th anniversary of ten pin bowling being played commercially in Great Britain. So it seemed fitting that, being very slightly over 50, I should have my first go at the game. After all, it couldn't be that difficult – could it?
The Tranquil is a name for the spiritual Viṣṇu, Nārāyaṇa – who generates an atmosphere which is absolutely devoid of worry and anxiety.
It was fun seeing the reaction of the receptionist when I told her my son had a popcorn kernel stuck up his nose. As we were waiting to be called back, Cameron suddenly shouted, "Mom it's coming out!" I looked up and sure enough it was right there, just blocking his nose hole. Ha! No doctor required after all!
These meant he would not be sending the looter to the Crown Court where he would face a possible higher sentence.
I had seen my older brother reading books and recall one night trying to get to sleep in our shared bedroom, which was difficult due to the fact he had the light on to read by. I recall asking him why he was laughing so much? His reply, 'I'm reading a funny book.' That book I now know to be 'Catch 22'. But it still made no sense to me; how does a book make you laugh? Oh, the ignorance of youth, eh?
Date: Tuesday, March 4, 2008
I grew up in Idaho - yes, on the potato field side. Even though I lived in a pretty much dairy and meat free home, my husband also grew up on the potato field side, so meat and potatoes makes a showing in our home quite frequently. I don't profess to be a whiz at meat...in fact my husband usually cooks meat better than I do. And my baked potatoes? Well, they're usually a little underbaked.
I didn't know when I started this that I would look back on these words to re-inhabit my life without my mother. I cry, sometimes, but the other day I smiled, I laughed at the thought of my little brother Michael showering her with kisses, as he told my mother how much nachas she brought.
Post ya Wednesday
I don’t have a problem with people who want to fight the strict appearance standards women have to live up to. I know some women who refuse to shave or wax their legs, arm-pits or their bikini line, and that’s fine, but they shouldn’t say that you need to stop shaving to be a proper feminist. You don’t have to shave or wear make-up or use push-up bras, if you don’t want to. But if you want to do these things, it should not affect your value as a person. The point feminists are trying to make is that everyone should be able to express their gender, or not to express it, in any way they like, and still get treated equally.
It is funny, I am reminded right now of a little thing… well, I thought it was little… I said in a prior sharing. “A lot will be asked of us.”
1/2 serrano pepper
Who is your favorite character in this book and why?: Sam Waterman is my favorite character, probably because he is the strongest willed. He actually gave me a hard time when I made him do certain things he didn't want to do. I never realized I could struggle with a product of my imagination before Sam. He's a difficult man.
Every once in a while in blogging you get an extra pleasant surprise.
"Cattle die, kinsmen die,
The night I was moved into a different room, I had to use the bathroom for the first time. Everything hurt and there was no way I could do my business without Todd's help. As he got me situated, I began to sob. "Was this what you imagined this would be like?" "Is this what you thought was going to happen when you were dating me?!"
Okay, I’ve been somewhat swamped with work and yet not. I still haven’t taken the time to do any blogging. Note my choice of words, “taken time”, because you need to take time for writing if you want to be an author. That’s what I’ve learned.
It's as if these "out of the ordinary" moments
Nodded to Kingsley Shacklebolt, and then,
The Rathbone and Bruce films, set largely in wartime Britain, are a curious re-imaging set in a parallel world in which the 1940s closely resemble the Victorian age and are tremendous fun – for generations these were probably the best known film version of the stories and novels.
One concern he spoke about was the Wright Law that controls some of Southwest’s flights connections out of Texas and when that law expires it could have an effect on Albuquerque air travel.
“Of course, she’s chief refugee spotter!”
…may explain the observed nonuniversality of prototrophy, stress resistance, and other cellular functions in the microbial world.
Would you like to see God’s glory in your life and in your church? The key is not a conference or a curriculum, not a program or a performance, not marketing or methods, not a better strategy or harder work. The key is much closer to you than any of that. The key is Christ alive in you (and with you) — the hope of glory. Stir up the gift of Christ inside of you! Stir the cold coals into flame and let Christ burn and blaze brilliantly in your midst.
4) I play softball with a bunch of fellow suburbanites. One, the pitcher, is an agent. He read over a few of my non-selling proposals and diagnosed why they were going nowhere.
1 flowers
So I did what any good recipe developer would do: I started watching the Packers/Giants playoff game. Green Bay had just fumbled the ball, and the Giants recovered it. And I exclaimed, “That’s it!”
Q:Why is the rescinding of PBS not part of the QOL discussion right now?
2. This should go without saying. Of course, the problem with saying something that everyone can agree on is that what constitutes ‘fun’ you’ll never get people to agree on. Some people find huffing glue fun, some people enjoy inflating their genitals with saline. I can’t say I understand the appeal but hey, whatever floats their boat eh? I like science fiction, fantasy, horror, high adventure, narrative mechanics, sword and sorcery, blood and tits, history, politics, the clash of magic/faith and science and a while bunch of other stuff. I’m going to do things that I find fun, because that’s the best and only guide I have.
Jessica is an awesome illustration which can be used for birthday, get well and encouragement cards. After adding yourself to my blog followers, please send me an email at info@guylousinimitability.com and I will send you this awesome digistamp.
Well, my parents suggested a solution. Instead of begging my co-workers to switch shifts with me for two months (no one wants graveyard so it would have been like pulling teeth and it would have bred a lot of resentment toward me if they were forced to trade by our boss) they offered to take Lyle Jr. home with them until either I got a new shift (we’re adding a shift so there’s a chance I’ll move to days anyway) or until Mr. Lyle gets home from training. As Mr. Lyle’s parents live in the same town as my parents, they can trade off watching him. They left this morning.
Kirklees council wants to make St George's Square even more impressive by removing the road in front of the station and disused fountain and mini-roundabout at the end of the square (by the green bus in the council's picture above), extending the pedestrianised part to cover it, restricting traffic on the road the bus is using, and adding more bus stops.
Like having a roof over your head.
“Intercessory prayer, prayer walks, extended worship, planting churches, setting up a school to train evangelists and pastors, these are just some of the things we’re doing, in addition to deliverance. I grew up in India where I learned at a young age about demons and demonization. I saw what it did to people. It’s real. When evil spirits invade a person’s life, that person needs deliverance. Jesus set the example by casting out demons,” Elijah said.
Here's one view of this card:
Number eight hung on for the first day and the owner quickly made a deal with her. Amalia had chosen her rider. That did not mean that she would not throw her off on occasion, only that she liked her better than the others.
For the record, this is my all time least favourite question - I have such a difficult time slapping a label on what I do. Under duress, I'd say my work is humble, honest, has clean lines and is balanced. Next please! (Mangosteens)
Enough to say that Gil learns a lot more about himself and what he can do to improve his writing and his life in the process of his nostalgic psychological journey.
continue?
In so many ways, Obama displays his disdain for those who both voted for and against him. America has never had a President that didn’t like it and, in November 2012, voters will have the opportunity to return the feeling.
Field of Flowers designers were given the opportunity to be imaginative, and the result was a wide variety of centerpieces and room décor. “This was exactly what the planners had in mind,” said Bak. “They encouraged us to go ‘all-out’ and we did just that.”
"The Hall brand name is recognized under the largest United States manufacturer of specialty chinaware, under this agreement we can proudly offer it to our customers as well. This partnership will add size and strength to America's place in the international china manufacturing world, and we will be able to offer the best of both companies' product lines and specialties, enabling us to work together in a challenging economy," he said.
Maybe I could give myself a break from trying for perfection and start sewing “wearable muslins.” After all, it’s only after wearing a garment that you can tell what fine-tuning is needed to get the pattern just right. Does this sound like a viable plan? I think it might. How about you? Is perfectionism keeping you from finishing anything? Let’s try giving ourselves permission to finish some garments that fit well, if not perfectly. Let’s try getting stuff finished and see how it feels.
If I ask a question just say yes or no
Optime positum est beneficium ubi meminit qui accipit. – Syrus, Maxims
4 necessary
But the NHS? The issue that made the Tories unelectable for well over a decade? The issue so toxic to Conservatives, Dave had to *Ringfence* the budget and make lots of "I really understand, honest I do" speeches?
Yes, sand. Terrified, I tell you.
It's 50 in Kentucky today. That's nuts considering it's been in the teens recently. It was so nice to leave my coat at home this morning!!
Then, leave the following information in the comments section:
This podcast is now only available as an iTunes download. You can grab this and every other Podrophenia show for free here: Podrophenia on iTunes
And then she quietly leaves
We are going to have a stinky street by next week, lol.
Prince Charming. Check.
UPDATE: The base was booby-trapped with two nukes. Thousands in Baja Calif and Sonora have felt the explosions. Several Plejaran ships were destroyed when the nukes went off. Semjase’s fleet is moving in to clean up radiation damage.
Nehru Jackets finds Heems tightening up his style, as well as his lyrical content, to some degree. While Das Racist always had a critical attitude towards modern western culture, Himanshu is much more explicit when it comes to politics and this is reflected in a more consistent flow compared to the first two tapes or even Das Racist’s LP from 2011, Relax. The first three tracks on Nehru Jackets show Heems in his typically sardonic niche, delivering marginally topic and humorous lyrics in his old pseudo-stoned style. After a brief interlude, we are introduced to a new aspect to Heems’ sound, with a pronounced Eastern influence both musically and on the vocals (a decent proportion of which are not in English). This is followed by the longest track on the tape, “SWATE”, which finds Heems back to his stylistic wordplay and a nice light track before he begins to get topical.
Today I woke up & realised I had nothing really appropriate for breakfast. I ate breakfast for the first time in literally months yesterday. Sesame Street’s “breakfast is the most important meal of the day” playing through my head, I had half a microwaved egg, a tomato & some celery for breakfast. I’m really giving it my all right now.
WE EXTEND our hand to all neighboring states and their peoples in an offer of peace and good neighborliness, and appeal to them to establish bonds of cooperation and mutual help with the sovereign Jewish people settled in its own land. The State of Israel is prepared to do its share in a common effort for the advancement of the entire Middle East.
‘You don’t know me but wherever I go they call me The Prophet,’ he looked around the crowd. ‘I think you all need to be saved.’
Still coughing, still having trouble breathing, still hoarse, still trouble swallowing. I’m eating a GERD-friendly diet, taking Prilosec 30 minutes before eating AM and PM, and nothing seems to change.
He met the students the summer before they began their freshman year during a field trip to Northwestern University, the first time many of them had ever stepped foot on a college campus. At the time, Hutchinson was Northwestern's assistant director of undergraduate admissions. Inspired by what he'd seen, he started working for Urban Prep two months later.
The assault came on the day President Hamid Karzai’s truncated cabinet – what was left after the Afghan Parliament twice rejected a large number of presidential nominees – was to be sworn in. It also comes prior to the arrival of tens of thousands of American and allied troops in Afghanistan.
Successfully, to my mind—based entirely on a scan of some photographs on the internet—the colored exterior glass works not only to vivify the building's urban site but to bring a constantly changing series of hues, like a colored bar code, onto the interior walkways. I would love to see this place lit from within at night, a sight the available photographs don't offer.
Sure enough, she said, that area is beginning to repopulate with stray cats.
Notice from T-Mobile
5) “Facemash is the first online network but, if Mark Zuckerberg create an online social network the Facebook is growing up 1 million users. ”
He dabbled and spill'd man's blood, and he kill'd
Alarren Fede. It immediately became one of my favourite blogs because it is a brilliant fusion between randomness, hilariousness and intelligent analysis: “Crotches of SL – Where crotches are examined and exposed in the name of science.”
He knew that when he kissed this girl, and forever wed his unutterable visions to her perishable breath, his mind would never romp again like the mind of God. So he waited, listening for a moment longer to the tuning-fork that had been struck upon a star. Then he kissed her. At his lips’ touch she blossomed for him like a flower and the incarnation was complete.
Looked down on you from Heaven's door-post
12 Too marvellous For Words (Whiting, Mercer) 4:06
What do I need to do?
300g Cake Flour
This is Baby A's card, otherwise know to the fam as Alex, or in his early months we called him Hootch because he was a BIG TIME drooler! For those who don't know, Hootch was a movie from the late 80j's or early 90's and one of the stars of the show was an oversize drooling dog...sorry Alex!
iii) They can now flirt and communicate with girls… According to statistics, 8 out of 10 girls are crazy about this dude named Cullen now..
One of the most penetrating psychiatrists,Wilhelm Reich,went mad.
hot
Let me be clear: I don't believe in making resolutions. I think it's a farce. You charge into the new year, all aflame with the good intentions, armed only with the turn of a calendar page. Before you know it, you have not lost 10 pounds, finished your novel or earned an extra $80,000. Surprise!
And the laughter!
places between
This is kit is created with golden hues and the essence of sunshine for summer or early autumn layouts.
“To fetch a style”, to hunt or scatter a “fabulous find” are just a few words to explain that mainly this is what this blog is about. The search of a particular piece of garment, or accessory that has the particular ability to turn an everyday outfit, into a total fashion statement. My advice is to always look into the details.
It's hard to fathom that this seemingly unending rollercoaster called 2011 can be summed up so shortly at the end of the ride. But I'll take those two ideas, tuck them into my hat as hard earned life lessons and keep on truckin'. Some of you may see these things as obvious, and the concepts are admittedly incredibly basic. But real life application is much harder than spewing words…. at least I can say that not only do I 'get it', I'm now fully living it.
For more information on the museum, including tour times and prices, please visit their website at http://historicdumfries.com/weemsbotts.html.
As far as detailed analysis goes, everything was good. Skull was the right size, belly was the right size, heart beat was good, umbilical cord was functioning as it should, and there were no discernible fetal abnormalities. Also, the volume of my amniotic fluid was at the 50th percentile, so totally normal.
- 1/2 c. dried cranberries
Anastasia Liasidou, Roehampton University, London, England: Inclusive education and critical pedagogy at the intersections of disability, race, gender and class
As I mentioned earlier in the week I have been working on a new release, well today I can give you a sneak peek of the next Fabulous CD and Stamp Release from Crafters Companion. When I first saw the set of 8 stamps I was blown away these are just stunning and then I received the CD and realised this is an absolute stunner of a Package, the CD is full of the most cute images, card ideas, Backing Papers and everything else you learn to expect from a Crafters Companion CD. I have kept you in suspense long enough this release is the well known “Paintbox Poppets”, I am sure lots of you are familiar with these fabulous images.
“jus·tice/ˈjəstis/
My Sugar is So Refined, The Hi-Lo’s
A super cute full circle skirt, featuring two side pockets and two buttons, one of which forms the opening for this skirt. .
Please note that these are usually the same people that get up in the middle of an important scene to go to the washroom and step on your foot while shoving their ass in your face.
And Bloomberg could offer a theory about inequality in this country, one that certainly would become controversial should he follow the entreaties of columnist Thomas Friedman and reconsider running for president as an independent.
watching her grasp the concept of giving back, of paying it forward.
5 Marine Radio 5:04
CODE RED – ON A NEED-TO-KNOW BASIS
*3/4-1 tsp Sea Salt to personal taste
What this means, in a nutshell, is that this colonization will take place only as long as we allow it to, and we will not allow it forever. Eventually we will completely cast aside the various psychological restraints that have been imposed upon us (and without which said colonization could never have occurred at all), resist it, and, at least to some extent, reverse it. There are only two ways this can happen: a) in a relatively orderly and civilized fashion, when a government with the political will to deal with the problem finally comes to power, or b) in an exceptionally violent and brutal fashion, with government playing by no means the only role, and perhaps not even a particularly large one.
Not to mention that it's a pretty freaking amazing concept, isn't it? I mean, hello... two guys who have the power to influence birds?!!
Use the same template. Spend some time beautifying a template with effective branding and a clean framework. To replicate your newsletter, simply copy it, the click “edit after copying” to go in and put fresh, new content in.
Kris is nearing the finale of her Autumn Scarf. Susan is contemplating casting on for one of her own. (Once she’s finished her second Gray Loop Cowl.) Susan is also knitting some Quick and Cozy socks from some Lamb’s Pride superwash (some of which she scored on Ravelry). Both Susan and Kris have shawls on their needles. They recently took Ann Weaver’s Triangular Shawl design class. They loved her and the class. If you are in the Boston area and wish you’d taken it, Sally saw that Ann was teaching another at Black Sheep Knitting Co. in Needham. Sally is knitting a South End Knitter’s Hat, and is looking forward to casting on another big owl. You can’t have too many. This is all a way to avoid making progress on the Zipped Vest that has been giving her a bad time.
Jo Anne and I are sorry that we have not posted very much in the last two weeks. Every time I sat down to do a post for my Blogs, I have had sometime come up. In April, I worked a lot a overtime at work and worked on setting up my online store on Ebay. I hope you will check out Dan the Mountain Man's Emporium. I sell books and I will be adding new books regularly.
Try it yourself - you deserve it!
but inside I think it's really cute.
optional: 1/4 cup simple white sauce.
